 We have four-month-old mice that were diabetic and now are not.
 The study is still in its early stages, as Dr Ehud Ur, a professor of medicine at Dalhousie University in Halifax, Nova Scotia, and director of the Canadian Diabetes Association's clinical and scientific Department,
 Like other experts, he is sceptical about the possibility of curing diabetes, pointing out that these results are not relevant to people who are already suffering from type 1 diabetes.
 The Secretary-General of the Swedish Academy, Anders Olsson, announced that the Academy had been unable to contact Bob Dylan.
 Danius has disclosed, I've telephoned and e-mailed his closest collaborator, who has replied in a very polite way.
 In previous years, Jamie Siminoff, the Ceo of Ring, has pointed out that the company was born when it couldn't yet hear the doorbell from its garage shop.
 He has said he built a Wi-Fi doorbell.
 Siminoff has said that sales increased after his appearance on Shark Tank in 2013, when the show's panel of investors refused to finance the startup.
 Siminoff appeared on the commercial television network QVC at the end of 2017.
 Ring has also reached a transitional agreement with the competing security services company, ADT Corporation.
 On the one hand, it seems that there is an experimental vaccine that can reduce the mortality from Ebola, on the other hand, no drug has yet been found that is clearly proven to be effective in the treatment of the existing infection.
 An antibody cocktail, ZMapp, initially showed promise in the field, but formal studies have revealed an efficacy lower than that hoped for in preventing deaths.
 In the PALM study, ZMapp was used as a control, meaning scientists used it as a reference and compared it to the other three therapies.
 The USA Gymnastics applauds the letter from the United States Olympic Committee and recognizes the absolute necessity for the Olympic community to work together
 We agree with the USOC that the interests of our athletes and clubs, and of their sport, can be best served by bringing about meaningful change within our organization, not by decertification.
 USA Gymnastics has commissioned an independent investigation to understand how such abuse as described by so many survivors of Larry Nassar could have been allowed to go on for so long, and USA Gymnastics is committed to implementing any and all necessary or appropriate changes.
 USA Gymnastics and the U S . Olympic Committee have the same goal of making gymnastics and other sports as safe as possible so that athletes can pursue their dreams in a safe, positive and accountable environment.
 In the course of the nineteen sixty s, Brzezinski was a counselor to John F . Kennedy and later to the Lyndon B . Johnson administration.
 In the course of the 1976 elections, he advised Carter on foreign policy, and then served as National Security Advisor from 1977 to 1981, succeeding Henry Kissinger.
 In his role as a member of the NSA, he collaborated with Carter on the diplomatic handling of international affairs, including the 1978 Camp David Accords, the normalization of U.S. relations with China in the late 1970s, the Iranian revolution, and the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan in 1979.
 The film, starring Ryan Gosling and Emma Stone, has been nominated in all of the major categories.
 Gosling and the stone have had the nomination for best actor and best actress respectively.
 The other nominations include best film, best director, best cinematography, best costume design, best editing, best original score, best production design, best sound editing, best sound mixing and best original screenplay.
 Two songs from the film, Audition and City of Stars, were nominated for Best Original Song.
 In the evening of Sunday, the President of the United States, Donald Trump, issued a statement through his spokesperson, in which he announced the withdrawal of American troops from Syria.
 The announcement came after a phone call between Trump and Turkish President Recep Tayyip Erdoğan.
 Turkey, the statement said, would also take over the custody of ISIS fighters in detention, which European nations have refused to repatriate.
 This not only confirms that some dinosaurs had feathers, a theory that's been widely accepted, but it provides greater detail than the fossils, such as the color and the three-dimensional arrangement.
 According to scientists, the bird's plumage was a dull, Brownish-Gray color on the upper part, with a paler or carotenoid coloring on the underside.
 The discovery also allows us to obtain detailed information about the evolution of feathers in birds.
 Because the dinosaur's feathering did not have the basic structure of a rachis, but instead had other characteristics typical of feathers, barbs and barbules, the researchers concluded that the rachis is probably the result of an evolutionary development subsequent to these characteristics.
 The structure of the feathers suggests that it was not used for flight, but rather for temperature regulation or for courtship.
 Second, according to the researchers, although the tail belongs to a young dinosaur, the specimen reveals a plumage of an adult dinosaur, not that of a chick.
 A car bomb exploded yesterday morning at the Gaziantep police headquarters in Turkey, killing two officers and injuring more than twenty people.
 The governor's office reported that among the injured, nineteen were police officers.
 The police have reported that the suspected attacker is a Daesh militant.
 They have discovered that the sun's operation is based on the same basic principles as those of the other stars: the activity of all the stars in the solar system is determined by nothing else but their luminosity and rotation.
 Luminosity is used in combination with rotation to define a star's Rossby number, which is related to the plasma flow.
 The lower the Rossby number, the less the star is active in terms of magnetic inversions.
 During his trip, Iwasaki got into trouble on several occasions.
 He was robbed by pirates, attacked by a rabid dog in Tibet, escaped a marriage in Nepal, and was arrested in India.
 The 802.11n standard can operate in both the 2.4Ghz and 5.0Ghz bands.
 Assuming that the base station has dual radios, this will allow it to be backwards compatible with 802.11a, 802.11b, and 802.11g.
 802.11n speeds are considerably higher than those of the preceding versions, with a maximum theoretical throughput of 600 Mbps.
 Duvall, who is married with two grown children, did not arouse Miller's great interest.
 At the request of the court, Miller responded, quote, Mike talks a lot during the hearing . I was preparing myself, so I didn't listen to what he was saying.
 We will strive to cut carbon dioxide emissions per unit of GDP by a significant margin by 2020, compared to the levels of 2005.
 It has not set a precise value for the reduction, stating that it will depend on Chinese economic productivity.
 Hu has urged developing countries to avoid the old way of polluting first and cleaning up afterwards.
 And he also added that they should not be forced to assume obligations that go beyond their stage of development,
 The Iraq inquiry published its report today at 12.00 GMT.
 He warned, no one can guarantee that any action in Iraq at this time will stop sectarian wars, the growing violence or a slide towards chaos.
 The report begins with a call for an open debate and for a consensus in the United States about the Middle East policy.
 The report is highly critical of almost all aspects of the current policy of the executive towards Iraq and calls for an immediate change of direction.
 The first of its 78 recommendations is to initiate a new diplomatic initiative by the end of this year to protect Iraq's borders from hostile action and to resume diplomatic relations with its neighbours.
 Cristina Fernandez de Kirchner, Argentina's current senator and first lady, announced her candidacy last night in La Plata, a city 50 kilometers from Buenos Aires.
 Kirchner chose the Teatro Argentino to announce her intention of running for the Presidency, the same place from which in 2005 she had launched her campaign for the Senate as a member of the Buenos Aires delegation.
 The discussion was sparked by controversy over the spending and rebuilding after Hurricane Katrina, which some fiscal conservatives, in jest, have labeled as the New Deal of Bush for New Orleans.
 The liberal criticism of the rebuilding effort focused on the awarding of reconstruction contracts to insider Washingtonians.
 Over four million people attended the funeral in Rome.
 The people present were so numerous that it was not possible for all to have access to the funeral in St . Peter's square.
 In various parts of Rome, large television screens were set up to allow people to watch the ceremony.
 Similar installations have been set up in many other Italian cities and around the world, especially in Poland, and a large number of people watched the event through them.
 Historians criticize the FBI's past policies, arguing that it concentrated on easy cases, such as car thefts, in order to increase the agency's success rate.
 The initiative against obscenity was funded by Congress beginning in fiscal year 2005, with a specific request to the FBI to assign 10 agents to adult pornography.
 Robin Uthappa scored the highest individual score of the innings with 70 runs in just 41 balls, scoring 11 fours and 2 sixes.
 Sachin Tendulkar and Rahul Dravid, middle order batsmen, played well and scored in collaboration a hundred runs.
 The captain then lost his wicket, and from that moment until the end of the innings India scored only 36 runs, losing 7 wickets.
 The morning of November 16, President George W . Bush arrived in Singapore and began his one-week stay in Asia.
 He was welcomed by Singapore's vice prime minister Wong Kan Seng and Prime Minister Lee Hsien Loong, with whom he discussed trade and terrorism.
 After a week of midterm election defeats, Bush gave a speech on the development of trade in Asia.
 After a 25-minute meeting Tuesday with NDP leader Jack Layton in the PMO, Prime Minister Stephen Harper said he was open to having the government's Clean Air Act reviewed by a committee of all parties in preparation for a second reading.
 In the course of the meeting, Layton had requested some amendments to the Conservative Party's environmental bill, urging a thorough and complete rewrite.
 Since the Federal Government has intervened to fund the Mersey hospital in Devonport, Tasmania, the state Government and several MPs have criticised the move as a pre-election stunt ahead of the Federal election in November.
 The Prime Minister, John Howard, has said the aim of the donation, thanks to an extra 45 million Australian dollars, was only to protect the hospital from being downgraded by the Tasmanian government.
 According to the latest bulletin, sea level readings have indicated the generation of a tsunami.
 No damage to property or people was reported in Tonga, although electricity was temporarily cut off and this, according to reports, prevented the Tongan authorities from receiving the tsunami warning from the PTWC.
 Fourteen Hawaiian schools located near the coasts were closed for the entire Wednesday, although the warnings had been canceled.
 The announcement was welcomed by U S . President George W . Bush.
 Gordon Johndroe, a spokesman for Bush, called the North Korean promise a "fundamental step towards the goal of denuclearizing the Korean peninsula.
 Today, the tenth storm of the Atlantic hurricane season, Subtropical Cyclone Jerry, formed in the Atlantic.
 According to the National Hurricane Center, Jerry at this point is no longer a threat to the mainland.
 According to the USACE, 6 inches of rain could break the damaged levees.
 The Ninth Ward, where Hurricane Katrina had caused flooding up to 20 feet, is now almost completely submerged as the water has breached the levee nearby.
 The water is spilling over a 100-foot section of the levee.
 The administrator of Commons, Adam Cuerden, has expressed his disapproval of the deletions during his chat with Wikinews last month.
 In substance, Wales lied to us from the beginning, first by acting as if it were for legal reasons,
 Following the outcry from the community, there have been efforts to redraft a policy on the site's sexual content, which hosts millions of openly licensed multimedia content.
 The work that has been done is mostly theoretical, but the program was written to simulate the actual surveys of the Sagittarius Galaxy.
 The team's goal was to see if the gravitational pull of the dark matter in this Galaxy could be felt by the dark matter in the Milky way.
 So the moon exerts a tidal force on the earth that generates the tides,
 Scientists have been able to deduce that the effects of dark matter on other dark matter are the same as the effects of normal matter on normal matter.
 This theory suggests that much of the dark matter around a Galaxy is collected in a sort of halo, made up of a multitude of small particles.
 The television footage shows the white smoke billowing from the plant.
 Local authorities are warning residents to stay in their homes, turn off air conditioning units, and not to drink tap water.
 According to the Japanese nuclear agency, radioactive cesium and iodine have been detected at the plant.
 The authorities' hypothesis is that this indicates a breach and consequent loss of uranium fuel containers at the site.
 Dr Tony Moll has identified extensively drug resistant tuberculosis, or XDR-TB, in the South African province of KwaZulu-Natal.
 In an interview, he said this new variant was highly concerning and alarming, due to the high death rate.
 Second, according to Dr . Moll, some patients may have contracted the microbe inside the hospital, and at least two of them were hospital staff.
 In a year, a person with the virus can infect from 10 to 15 close contacts.
 Despite this, the percentage of XDR-TB in the total group of TB patients still seems low, at 6,000 out of a total of 330,000 people infected at any one time in South Africa.
 The collision between the two satellites, both weighing more than 1,000 pounds and traveling at about 17,500 miles per hour, occurred 491 miles from the earth.
 Scientists say the collision caused an explosion.
 They're still trying to determine the size of the impact and what consequences it will have on the earth.
 The United States Strategic Command of the Department of Defense is tracking the debris.
 The results of the tracing will be published on a public Website.
 The authorities in Ohio report that a doctor who worked at the children's hospital in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, will be charged with aggravated murder after the discovery of his mother's dead body in the trunk of her car on Wednesday.
 Dr . Malar Balasubramanian, 29, was found in Ohio, at Blue Ash, a suburb about 15 miles north of Cincinnati, lying on the side of the road with her underwear and a T-shirt, apparently under the influence of drugs.
 He directed the agents toward his old black Intrigue that was 500 feet away.
 There, wrapped in blood-soaked blankets, was the body of Saroja Balasubramanian, 53.
 According to police, the body had been there for about a day.
 The first cases of the seasonal illness were reported at the end of July.
 Pigs are carriers of the disease, which is then transmitted to humans via mosquito bites.
 The Indian government, pushed by the epidemic, has adopted some measures such as deploying people to catch the pigs in the worst-hit areas, distributing thousands of mosquito nets and spraying pesticides.
 The government has also promised several million vaccine doses against encephalitis, to ensure that next year's health facilities are not caught unprepared.
 The plans for delivery of vaccines to the historically hardest-hit areas this year have been delayed because of a lack of funds and because they have been given a low priority level compared to other diseases.
 Three years after his transfer to Sweden in 1956, Słania began working for the Swedish postal service, becoming its chief engraver.
 He has created more than 1,000 stamps, both for Sweden and for 28 other countries.
 The quality and detail of his work are so recognized that his is one of the few names that are recognized by the general public.
 In two thousand and ten, it issued its one thousandth stamp, the magnificent David Klöcker Ehrenstrahl's,
 His work also consisted of engraving the banknotes of many countries, including the portraits of the Prime Minister on the front of the new Canadian 5 and 100 dollar bills.
 Gibson, after the accident, was rushed to the hospital, but he died shortly after.
 The truck driver, who is 64, came out of the collision unharmed.
 The vehicle involved was removed from the scene of the accident the same day, around 12:00 GMT.
 A person who worked at a nearby auto repair shop said, quote,
 They all returned to the place where the accident had occurred.
 Other topics on the Bali agenda include saving the world's last remaining forests and sharing technologies to support the growth of developing nations in a less polluting way.
 The UN also hopes to create a fund to help countries hit by global warming to cope with its impacts.
 The money could be used to build flood-resistant houses, to improve water management and to diversify crops.
 The Fluke has written that efforts by some to discourage women from speaking openly about women's health have not been successful.
 She has come to this conclusion thanks to the multitude of positive and encouraging comments she has received from both men and women who are pushing for the recognition of contraceptive pills as a medical necessity.
 At the end of the combat, once the wounded had been transported to the hospital, about 40 of the remaining detainees remained in the courtyard, refusing to return to their cells.
 The negotiators have been trying to resolve the situation, but the demands of the inmates are unclear.
 Between 10:00 and 11:00 PM MDT, the inmates set a fire in the yard.
 Soon after, riot police entered the courtyard and cornered the inmates, using tear gas.
 The firefighters eventually managed to control the fire at 23:35.
 Following the construction of the dam in 1963, the seasonal flooding that spread sediments along the course of the river ceased.
 This sediment has been critical in the creation of both beaches and sandbars that have become habitat for wildlife.
 Two species of fish have been wiped out and two others are at risk of extinction, including the bluntnose sixgill.
 Even if the floodwaters only raise the water level by a few metres, the authorities hope that this will be enough to restore the eroded sandbanks further downstream.
 No tsunami warning has been issued and according to the Jakarta geophysics agency, no tsunami warning will be issued because the quake did not reach magnitude 6.5.
 Despite the fact that there was no tsunami risk, residents began to panic and abandon their activities and homes.
 Despite the fact that Oprah Winfrey has said goodbye to her talk show,
 This is not a farewell. Here ends one chapter and a new one begins.
 The results of the Namibian presidential and parliamentary elections saw the re-election of the incumbent President, Hifikepunye Pohamba, who won a significant majority.
 In the parliamentary elections, the ruling SWAPO party remains in power.
 The coalition and Afghan troops have reached the area to secure the site, and then the support of other coalition aircraft has arrived.
 The accident occurred in high mountain and is believed to have been caused by enemy fire.
 The search for the site of the crash is hampered by bad weather and rough terrain.
 The medical charity, Medecins Sans Frontieres, and the World Health Organisation say this is the worst outbreak they have seen in the country.
 The Angolan epidemic is the worst ever and the situation in this country remains very serious.
 Today at 10:00 the weather was magnificent when the matches began and, despite a short shower of rain at the middle of the morning, which lasted only a few minutes, it was a perfect day for the Rugby Sevens.
 South Africa, the tournament's first seed, started off with a bang, winning their first match against Zambia, the fifth seed, by a comfortable margin of 26-0.
 Despite looking rather rusty in the match against the Southern sisters, South Africa has still managed to improve its performance throughout the tournament.
 They had distinguished themselves in the defense, the ability to handle the ball and excellent teamwork.
 The tree, according to officials of the city of Amsterdam and the museum of Anna Frank, is infested with a fungus and constitutes a danger to public health because, they say, it is in imminent danger of falling.
 It was due to be demolished on Tuesday, but it has been saved by an urgent court decision.
 The entrances to the caves, called the seven sisters, are all at least 100 to 250 meters wide.
 The infrared images show thermal oscillations between day and night, which is a proof that they are probably caves.
 In the daytime they are colder than the surrounding surface, and at night they are warmer.
 The behavior of the earth's crust is not constant, as Glen Cushing, of the us Geological survey and Northern Arizona University, Flagstaff, Arizona, has said,
 In France, voting is traditionally a low-tech experience: voters enter an isolated booth and put in a pre-printed ballot that indicates the candidate they have chosen.
 After the voter's identity is verified by the officials, the voter deposits the ballot in the ballot box and signs the register of voters.
 The French electoral law codifies the procedures in a rather rigorous way.
 From 1988, the ballot boxes must be transparent so that voters and observers can testify that at the beginning of the vote no envelopes are present and that no others are added beyond those of the voters, duly counted and authorised.
 Candidates may send representatives to assist in every phase of the process, and at night, volunteers count the votes under strict supervision, according to specific procedures.
 The Eee PC of ASUS, previously launched worldwide for aspects related to saving and functionality, became a controversial topic at the IT Month event of Taipei 2007.
 But the consumer market for laptops will be significantly changed and different after the Taiwan Sustainable Award was given to ASUS by the executive Yuan of the Republic of China in 2007.
 The Website of the station describes the show as, quote, old-fashioned radio theater with a new and disrespectful Geek-Out.
 Initially, the show aired only on the historic Toginet radio, specializing in talk radio.
 TogiNet has established AstroNet Radio as a consociate station at the end of 2015.
 The show originally used non-professional voice actors from the East Texas area.
 Widespread looting would have continued during the night, given the absence of law enforcement on the streets of Biškek.
 According to one eyewitness, Biškek was sinking into a state of anarchy, with gangs of people roaming the streets and looting shops.
 Various Bihalk residents have criticized the protesters in the south for illegal actions.
 South Africa won against the All Blacks in the Rugby Union Tri Nations tournament held at the Royal Bafokeng Stadium in Rustenburg.
 The final score was a one-point victory for New Zealand, ending a 15-game winning streak by the All Blacks.
 For the Springboks, this was the end of a five-match losing streak.
 It was the last game for the All Blacks, who had won the cup two weeks earlier.
 The final match of the tournament, which will see the Springboks take on Australia, is scheduled to take place next week at the Ellis Park Stadium in Johannesburg.
 On Monday, a minor earthquake struck Western Montana at 22:08.
 The United States Geological Survey and its National Earthquake Information Center have not received any immediate reports of damage.
 The epicenter of the earthquake was located about 20 kilometers north-northwest of Dillon and about 65 kilometers south of Butte.
 The H5N1 avian influenza virus, which is deadly to humans, has been confirmed in a wild duck found dead on Monday in a marsh near Lyon.
 The United States is the seventh country in the European Union, after Austria, Germany, Slovenia, Bulgaria, Greece and Italy, to be hit by the virus.
 The suspected cases in Croatia and Denmark have not yet been confirmed.
 Chambers had sued God for sowing death, destruction and terror among millions and millions of the earth's inhabitants.
 According to Chambers, a non-believer, his legal case is superficial and anyone can be sued by anyone.
 The story presented by Camille Saint-Saens at the French opera tells of an artist whose life revolves around the love of drugs and Japan.
 This means that during the show the actors smoke pipes and urge the audience to join them.
 They are Newt Gingrich, the former Speaker of the House, Rick Perry, the governor of Texas, and Michele Bachmann, a member of the House of Representatives.
 After the results came in, Gingrich praised Santorum but heaped harsh words on Romney, for whom negative Iowa ads had been aired.
 Perry has said, I will return to Texas to verify the results of tonight's vote and see if there is a path forward for me in this race.
 Bachmann, who won the straw poll in Iowa in August, has decided to end her campaign.
 The photographer was rushed to the Ronald Reagan UCLA Medical Center, where he later died.
 The doctor, who was not present at the time of the accident, said in a statement, quote,
 The doctor who worked at the children's hospital of Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, will be charged with aggravated murder after her mother was found dead in the trunk of her car Wednesday, authorities in Ohio say.
 According to police, it's unlikely the driver of the car that hit the photographer will face any penalties.
 With only eighteen medals available each day, a good number of countries just didn't make it onto the podium.
 The Netherlands, with Anna Jochemsen in ninth place in yesterday's Super-G, and Finland, with Katja Saarinen in tenth place.
 The Australian Mitchell Gourley has obtained the eleventh place in the men's Super-G, while the Czech rival Oldrich Jelinek has obtained the sixteenth place in the same speciality.
 The Mexican Arly Velasquez finished in fifteenth place in the men's Super-G, and the New Zealander Adam Hall finished ninth in the men's Super-G.
 The Polish blind skier Maciej Krezel and his guide Anna Ogarzynska finished in thirteenth place in the Super-G.
 The UN peacekeepers who arrived in Haiti after the 2010 earthquake are believed to have brought the disease with them.
 According to the lawsuit, inadequate sanitation of the United Nations camp caused bacterial contamination of the Artibonite River, one of Haiti's main waterways.
 Before the arrival of the troops, Haiti's problems with cholera dated back to the 1800s.
 The Haitian Institute for Justice and Democracy cited independent studies which claim the disease was inadvertently introduced to Haiti by Nepalese UN peacekeeping forces.
 Danielle Lantagne, a United Nations expert on the disease, has said the outbreak may have been caused by the peacekeepers.
 Hamilton has confirmed that the patient is in a stable condition at the Howard University hospital.
 The patient had traveled to Nigeria, where there have been some cases of Ebola virus.
 The hospital followed the protocol for infection control, including isolating the patient to prevent others from becoming infected.
 Before the Simpsons, Simon worked on various programs in different roles.
 In the eighty s he worked on shows like taxi, cheers and the tracey Ullman show.
 In 1989, he participated in the creation of the Simpsons alongside Brooks and Groening, and he selected the first team of writers for the show.
 He left the show in 1993, but retained the title of executive producer, and continues to receive tens of millions of dollars in royalties every year.
 In a first moment, the Chinese news agency Xinhua had reported the hijacking of a plane.
 According to reports received subsequently, the plane had been threatened with a bomb and was diverted to Kandahar, where it landed.
 The first reports state that the aircraft was diverted again to Afghanistan after it was denied emergency landing in Ürümqi.
 Air accidents are common in Iran, whose fleet is now obsolete and poorly maintained, both in the civilian and military sectors.
 International sanctions meant that they could not buy new aircraft.
 At the beginning of this week, three people were killed and three others injured after a police helicopter crashed.
 The month before, Iran had its worst air disaster in years, when a passenger plane crashed in Armenia, killing all 168 people on board.
 The same month saw another airliner crash in Mashad, killing seventeen people.
 The subsequent concerts of the tour were canceled by Aerosmith.
 The rock band Saratoga had to leave for a tour in the United States and Canada that was supposed to last until September 16.
 The band canceled the tour after lead singer Steven Tyler injured his foot in a fall from the stage during a performance on August 5.
 Murray lost the first set in a tie-break after the players had maintained their serves in the set.
 Del Potro had an early advantage in the second set, which he also ended up winning after a tie-break.
 At this point, Del Potro was undergoing a shoulder treatment but managed to return to the court.
 The program began at 20:30 local time,
 Some famous singers from all over the country have offered bhajan, or devotional songs, at the feet of Shri Shyam.
 The singer Sanju Sharma opened the evening, followed by Jai Shankar Choudhary. Lakkha Singh, accompanied by the singer Raju Khandelwal, also presented the bhajan chhappan bhog.
 Then Lakkha Singh took the lead and started singing the bhajan.
 They served Baba Shyam 108 Chhappan Bhog, which is 56 edible products, including sweets, fruits, nuts, dishes, etc.
 Lakkha Singh also presented the bhajan for the chhappan bhog, accompanied by the singer Raju Khandelwal.
 At the Tokyo Game Show press conference on Thursday, Nintendo president Satoru Iwata revealed the design of the new Nintendo Revolution Controller.
 In a similar way to the TV remote control, through two sensors located next to the user's television, the Controller is able to triangulate its position in three-dimensional space.
 This will allow players to control actions and movements within the game by moving the device in the air.
 Soon after the start, Giancarlo Fisichella lost control of his car and ended his race.
 Fernando Alonso, his teammate, was in the lead for most of the race, but his race ended shortly after his pit stop, probably because of the incorrect mounting of the right front wheel.
 Michael Schumacher reached the finish line behind Alonso, due to a suspension damage that he had suffered in one of the duels that he had been protagonist of during the race.
 In a transcript of the press conference, he is quoted as saying, quote, she's very gracious and she sings pretty well.
 Every time we've done the tests, I've been moved to the depths of my heart.
 After about 3 minutes from launch, a camera on board saw various pieces of insulating foam breaking away from the fuel tank.
 It is not believed, however, that they caused any damage to the shuttle.
 N . Wayne Hale Jr, director of the NASA space shuttle program, stated that the foam had fallen after the moment that had been troubling them.
 Five minutes after the show begins, the wind starts, about a minute later, the wind is reaching 70 km per hour, then it starts to rain, so violently and torrentially that it stings your skin like a needle, then it starts to hail, people in a panic, screaming and running,
 I lost my sister and her friend, while I was moving, I had two disabled people in front of me,
 NHK also reported that the Kashiwazaki Kariwa nuclear power plant, which is located in Niigata Prefecture, was regularly operating.
 The Hokuriku Electric Power Co. reported no damage from the earthquake, and said that reactors 1 and 2 at the Shika nuclear power plant were shut down.
 According to reports, around 9,400 homes in the area are without water and around 100 without electricity.
 Some roads are damaged, the railway network has been disrupted in the affected areas, and the Noto airport in Ishikawa Prefecture remains closed.
 An explosion has occurred outside the office of the governor-general.
 In the space of two hours, three more bombs exploded in the vicinity of government buildings.
 According to some reports, the official death toll is eight, and the official reports confirm that there have been up to 30 injured, although the final numbers are not yet known.
 In the urine samples of deceased people who had eaten contaminated pet food, traces of both cyanuric acid and melamine were found.
 The researchers at the University have stated that the two compounds react with each other to form crystals that can hinder the functioning of the kidneys.
 Researchers have found in the urine of cats the formation of crystals, due to the addition of melamine and cyanuric acid.
 In comparison via infrared spectroscopy, the composition of these crystals corresponds to that found in the urine of pets that are affected.
 I don't know if you realize it or not, but a large part of the goods coming from Central America have entered our country duty-free.
 Despite this, 80% of our goods were taxed with duties in the countries of Central America.
 I thought all this made no sense, and it certainly didn't seem right.
 All I say to the people is treat us as we treat you.
 The governor of California, Arnold Schwarzenegger, has signed a law banning the sale or rental of violent Video games to minors.
 The proposed law would require that violent Video games sold in the state of California be labeled with a warning label that says,
 The prosecutor, Kier Starmer, said this morning that Huhne and Pryce will both be charged.
 Huhne has resigned and will be replaced in the government by Ed Davey MP. Norman Lamb MP is expected to take over the role of Minister for Business, Energy and Industrial Strategy vacated by Davey.
 The appearance of Huhne and Pryce at the magistrates' court in Westminster is scheduled for the 16th of February.
 The victims were Nicholas Alden, 25, and the driver, Zachary Cuddeback, 21.
 Edgar Veguilla has reported injuries to his arm and jaw, while Kristoffer Schneider will have to undergo a facial reconstruction surgery.
 Uka's weapon did not explode when it was pointed at the head of a fifth man, Schneider has constant pain, is blind in one eye, and has a section of his skull reconstructed in titanium.
 Schneider testified via Video-Conference from a U S . Air Force base in his home country.
 In addition to Wednesday's event, the Carpanedo participated in two single events of the Championships.
 The first in the slalom, where at the first run she made a DNF, and another 36 out of 116 in the same race did not finish.
 The other race she participated in, the giant slalom, saw her finish tenth in the women's category of the category, with a combined time of 4:41.30, which was 2:11.60 minutes slower than the first-place Austrian Claudia Loesch, and 1:09.02 minutes slower than the Hungarian Gyöngyi Dani, who finished in ninth.
 Four of the women's skiers failed to finish their runs, and 45 of the 117 participants in the giant slalom did not finish.
 The police in Madhya Pradesh managed to recover the laptop and the mobile phone that had been stolen.
 The vice inspector general, DK Arya, announced, quote, we have arrested five people for the rape of the Swiss woman, and we have also recovered her cell phone and her laptop.
 The names of the accused are Baba Kanjar, Bhutha Kanjar, Rampro Kanjar, Gaza Kanjar and Vishnu Kanjar.
 According to the superintendent of police, Chandra Shekhar Solanki, the accused appeared in court with their faces covered.
 None of the three people who were in the house at the time of the car crash were injured.
 In spite of this, the driver was seriously injured in the head.
 The road on which the accident occurred was temporarily closed, while the emergency services freed the driver from the red Audi TT.
 He was initially treated at the James Paget hospital in Great Yarmouth.
 He was then transferred to Addenbrooke's hospital in Cambridge.
 Since then, Adekoya has been at the Edinburgh sheriff court with the charge of killing his own son.
 She is being held in custody pending trial and a court case, but any testimony given by an eyewitness could be tainted, since her image has been widely publicized.
 In just two weeks the Americans and Free French forces had liberated southern France and were turning towards Germany.
 According to Pamela Ferguson, a lecturer at the University of Dundee,
 The Crown Office, which has overall responsibility for prosecuting cases, told reporters it would make no further comment until the formal charge is laid.
 According to leaked reports, the document will focus on the dispute over borders, which Palestine wants to be based on the pre-1967 borders.
 According to what is being said, the other topics that are being discussed include the future status of Jerusalem, which is sacred to both nations, and the question of the Jordan Valley.
 Once the agreement is signed, Israel demands a permanent military presence in the valley, while the Palestinian authority agrees to abandon it only for five years.
 The rangers, who were to be the experiment's watchdogs,
 In the framework of the hunting program of the Sporting Shooters Association, the NPWS in collaboration with the Sporting Shooters Association of Australia,
 According to Mick O'Flynn, acting director of Park Conservation and Heritage at the NPWS, the four selected shooters for the first operation received extensive training and safety instructions.
 Yesterday Martelly swore in a new Provisional Electoral Council,
 This is the fifth provisional electoral Council of Martelly in four years.
 Last month a Presidential Commission proposed a package of measures aimed at pushing the country towards new elections, including the resignation of the previous CeP.
 The Commission constituted Martelly's response to the widespread protests that began in October, challenging the regime.
 The occasional violent protests have been triggered by the failure to hold elections, some of which were scheduled as early as 2011.
 There have been about 60 reported cases of iPod overheating, which have caused a total of six fires and caused minor burns to four people.
 The Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry of Japan has stated that it is aware of 27 incidents related to the devices.
 The Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry announced last week that it had been informed by Apple of another 34 incidents, which the company called non-serious.
 In its response, the Ministry called the report's delay by Apple, quote, absolutely deplorable.
 The earthquake in the Mariana Islands was felt at 07:19 local time,
 According to the Northern Mariana Islands' Office of Homeland Security and Emergency Management, no damage was reported in the Commonwealth.
 And the Pacific Tsunami Warning Center has reported that there are no tsunami warnings in place.
 In Manila, the capital of the Philippines, a former Filipino policeman hijacked a bus full of Hong Kong tourists.
 With his M16 rifle, Rolando Mendoza fired on the tourists.
 Many of the hostages have been rescued, at least six have died.
 Six hostages, including children and the elderly, were released immediately, along with the Filipino photographers.
 The photographers then replaced an elderly lady who needed to use the bathroom, and Mendoza was shot dead.
 Liggins has followed in his father's footsteps and has gone on to become a medical doctor.
 After training as a midwife, she joined the National Women's Hospital in Auckland in 1959.
 While serving at the hospital, in his spare time, Liggins began to study cases of premature labour.
 His research has shown that the administration of a hormone accelerates the maturation of the lungs in the foetus.
 Xinhua reported that government investigators Wednesday recovered two black boxes with flight recordings.
 Even his fellow wrestlers wanted to pay tribute to Luna.
 Tommy Dreamer has stated, Luna was the first Queen of the Extreme. My first manager. She passed away on the night of the two moons.
 Luna was as crazy as me, maybe even crazier,
 Second, according to a poll of 1,400 people before the 2010 Federal election, the number of people opposed to Australia becoming a Republic had increased by 8% since 2008.
 In the course of the 2010 Federal election campaign, the then Prime Minister, Julia Gillard, stated that she believed Australia should become a Republic at the end of Elizabeth II's reign.
 The Queen is also the head of the Commonwealth,
 At the opposite end of the survey, 29% of those interviewed believe that Australia should become a Republic as soon as possible, while 31% believe it should never become a Republic.
 The Olympic gold medalist was supposed to compete in the 100 and 200-meter freestyle and three relay events at the Commonwealth games, but she has been plagued by several injuries that have led to doubts about her physical condition.
 He could not take the necessary medication to overcome the pain because they are banned from the Games.
 On January 25, Curtis Cooper, a mathematician and computer science professor at the University of Missouri-Columbia, discovered the largest prime number ever known.
 The discovery was verified by several people through the use of various hardware and software at the beginning of February, and was announced Tuesday.
 Comets could have been one of the sources that brought water and organic matter, the stuff that can form proteins and support life, to earth.
 Scientists hope to understand how planets form, and in particular, how the earth was formed by a collision with comets very long ago.
 Cuomo, 53, has been governor since the beginning of this year, and he signed a law last month that made same-sex marriage legal.
 According to him, speculations are nothing but chatter and political idiocies.
 He is expected to run for President in the 2016 election.
 Second, the FAA says, NextGen will allow planes to fly shorter routes and save millions of gallons of fuel each year, thereby reducing carbon dioxide emissions.
 The system employs satellite technology instead of the obsolete ground-based radar to allow air traffic controllers to locate aircraft with greater precision and to provide pilots with more accurate information.
 No additional transport is being put in place, and surface trains will not be stopping at Wembley, while there are no car parks or park and rides available on the site.
 The fears of the absence of transportation led to the possibility of having the match played behind closed doors, without the support of the team's fans.
 According to a study published Thursday in the journal Science, a new species of bird has been born on the Galapagos Islands in Ecuador.
 Second, according to researchers at Princeton University in the United States and the University of Uppsala in Sweden, the new species evolved in just two generations,
 Gold can be worked in any shape, it can be rolled up to create tiny shapes.
 It can be pulled until it forms a thin wire, suitable for being twisted and woven.
 It can be made very thin and attached to other metals, and sometimes it was used to decorate the pictures painted by hand in the books called illuminated manuscripts.
 Using the juice from the red cabbage, it is possible to construct a pH indicator.
 The juice of the cabbage changes color based on how acidic or alkaline the chemical element is.
 The level of pH in the chemical being analyzed is given by the amount of hydrogen ions present.
 Ions of hydrogen are protons to which electrons have been stripped.
 Mix the two dried powders together and then, with clean, wet hands, roll them into a ball.
 Between the moisture on your hands and the outer layers, a reaction will take place that will cause a strange sensation and form a sort of a shell.
 Almost all the houses in the cities of Harappa and Mohenjo-daro had a bathroom with running water, connected to an advanced sewage system.
 In Greece, in the Minoan cities of Crete and Santorini, there have been found remains of sewage systems.
 In ancient Egypt, Persia, and China, the toilet was sometimes included in the public baths, frequented by both sexes.
 To call someone thousands of miles away, a satellite is used.
 The satellite in space receives the signal and then sends it back almost instantly.
 The satellite was launched into space by a rocket, and scientists use space telescopes because the atmosphere of the earth distorts light and vision.
 To get a satellite or telescope into space, a rocket must be more than 100 feet tall.
 The wheel has enormously changed the world, and among the various advantages it has given us, the most important is that it has provided us with simpler and faster means of transportation.
 Thanks to his invention, the train, the automobile and several other means of transportation have come into being.
 Below them are other medium-sized cats that feed on medium-sized prey, ranging from rabbits to antelopes and deer.
 There are many small cats, including feral cats, that feed on small prey, such as insects, rodents, lizards, and birds.
 The concept of a niche is the secret of their success, a particular goal that each cat has and that allows them to not compete with others.
 The lions are the most social of the cats, and they live in large groups called prides.
 The males are compelled to remain in the herd, and are usually 2 or 3 related, and a number of females and cubs, which may amount to 30.
 Usually the females are closely related to each other, being a large family of daughters and sisters.
 The lion's behaviour is very much like that of a wolf or dog pack, whose behaviour is in fact surprisingly analogous to that of lions,
 A complete athlete, the tiger is able to climb, swim, jump, and exert a pulling force five times that of a strong man.
 The tiger belongs to the same family as the lion, the leopard, and the jaguar.
 The roar of the tiger is not as loud as that of the lion, but it sounds more like a string of angry words.
 Ocelots love to eat small animals, and if possible, they will hunt monkeys, snakes, rodents, and almost any other prey that they can catch.
 Scientists believe that ocelots follow and find their prey by smelling the ground where their prey has been.
 Thanks to their night vision, they are able to see very well in the dark, and are also able to move furtively.
 When a small group of living things (a small population) separates from the main population to which it belongs,
 This new environment is characterized by different resources and competitors, so in order to position itself as a strong competitor, the new population will need different characteristics or transformations than those that were necessary in the past.
 The original population has not changed at all, and continues to need the same adaptations as before.
 And as time goes by, and as the new population adapts to its new environment, it looks less and less like the other population.
 At some point, after thousands or even millions of years, the two populations will appear so different that they can no longer be defined as belonging to the same species.
 The process of evolution is inevitable and is an essential part of the evolutionary process.
 Plants produce oxygen, which is breathed by humans, and absorb the carbon dioxide expelled by humans through their breathing.
 Plants make their own food by using the sun's energy through a process called photosynthesis.
 We build our houses from plants, we make our clothes from plants, and we eat a lot of the food that we eat from plants.
 The Mosasaurus was the apex predator of its era and, as such, feared nothing but other Mosasaurs.
 From its long fauces, or jaws, more than 70 razor-sharp teeth protruded, plus an additional row situated on the palate.
 We don't know for sure, but it's possible that he had a forked tongue, and his diet included turtles, large fish, and possibly other mosasaurs.
 He also attacked anything that entered the water, even a giant dinosaur like the T-Rex.
 Although most of their foods would seem familiar to us, Roman banquets also featured several strange or unusual dishes, such as wild boar, peacock, snails, and a rodent called the Ghiro.
 Another difference was that while the poor and women ate sitting on chairs, the rich men loved to banquet together while reclining on one side.
 Of course, the food of the ancient Romans did not include many of the foods that have been introduced to Europe from the Americas or Asia centuries later.
 For example, they had no maize, tomatoes, potatoes or cacao, and none of the ancient Romans had ever tasted a turkey.
 The Babylonians built a main temple for each of their gods, which was considered the home of the deity.
 People brought sacrifices to the gods and priests tried to provide for the needs of the gods through ceremonies and festivals.
 Every temple had an open courtyard and then a sacred inner sanctum accessible only to priests.
 Sometimes, they would construct special pyramid-shaped towers, called ziggurats, which would become part of the temple.
 The top of the tower was a sanctuary dedicated to the god.
 Thanks to the mild climate that characterizes the Middle East, the house was not of fundamental importance.
 And so much of the family life took place outdoors.
 The women cooked in the courtyard, while the shops were just simple open-air stalls that faced the street.
 In the land of Canaan there were no great forests, so wood was very expensive.
 Greenland was sparsely populated, and in the Norse Sagas it is said that Erik the Red gave it its name after he encountered Greenland on his voyage following his exile from Iceland for murder.
 But, regardless of his discovery, at that time the Eskimo tribes were already living there.
 Although all of these countries are considered to be Scandinavian, the peoples, Kings, customs, and history of Denmark, Sweden, Norway, and Iceland were very different.
 If you've seen the movie, the Da Vinci code, you might think that the Declaration of Independence has a map of the treasure on the back.
 However, this is false. Even though there is writing on the back of the document, it is not a treasure map.
 On the back of the Declaration of independence is the statement, written upside down,
 Despite the fact that it is not known for certain who wrote it, it is well known that at the beginning of its existence the large parchment document, which measures 29.75 inches by 24.5 inches, was rolled up to be stored.
 Probably, then, the annotation was only added as an etiquette label.
 The D-Day landings and the fighting that followed had brought the North of France to liberation, but the South was still occupied.
 It was ruled by the Vichy regime, or by those French who in 1940 had made peace with the Germans and allied themselves with the invaders, instead of fighting them.
 On August 15, 1940, the Allies invaded Southern France, an action that took the name of the operation,
 The American and French liberation armies had liberated the South of France in just two weeks,
 By civilization, we mean a specific culture, shared by a significantly large group of people who live and work in a collaborative way, forming a society.
 The word civilization derives from the Latin word civilis, which means civil, and is in turn related to the word civis, or citizen, and to the word civitas, or city.
 The city-states are the first realities to anticipate the idea of nation. The culture of civilization means to transmit knowledge through more generations, to leave a cultural imprint through an equal diffusion.
 Minority cultures often disappear without leaving a trace, and are therefore not recognized as true civilizations.
 During the war of independence, the thirteen states formed a weak central government for the first time, and the Congress was its only component, according to the Articles of Confederation.
 The Congress had no power to impose taxes, and, given the absence of an executive or judiciary at the national level, it relied on state authorities, often little cooperative, to enforce its acts.
 He had no authority to bypass tax laws and tariffs between the states.
 To amend the articles required the unanimous consent of all the states, which in turn had so little regard for the central government that their representatives were often absent.
 The Italian national football team is, along with the German national football team, the second most successful football team in the world.
 Among the most popular sports are: football, basketball, volleyball, water polo, fencing, rugby, cycling, ice hockey, and Formula 1 auto racing.
 Winter sports are more widespread in the northern regions, and Italians are involved in international competitions and Olympic events.
 Japan is made up of almost 7,000 Islands, the largest of which is Honshu, and this makes Japan the seventh largest archipelago in the world.
 From a geographical point of view, Japan is referred to as an archipelago, considering the presence of groups of Islands that compose it.
 Taiwan was first recorded by European sailors in the fifteenth century, when they named it Ilha Formosa, or the beautiful island.
 The Dutch East India company established a base in the southwest of Taiwan in 1624, beginning a transformation of the aboriginal cereal production systems and importing Chinese labourers to work in its rice and sugar plantations.
 In 1683, the western and northern coastal areas of Taiwan came under the control of the Qing dynasty.
 After being defeated in the first Sino-Japanese war, the Qing government signed the Treaty of Shimonoseki in 1895, ceding Taiwan to Japan.
 Machu Picchu comprises three primary structures, and notably the Intihuatana, the Temple of the Sun, and the Temple of the Three Windows.
 A great deal of the outer buildings have been rebuilt to give tourists a more accurate idea of what they looked like.
 In 1976, thirty percent of the site of Machu Picchu had been recovered, but the restoration works are still ongoing.
 The most common format in the world for still photography, for example, is 35 mm, the same as the most commonly used film on the end of the analogue era.
 It is still produced today and, more importantly, its aspect ratio is inherited from the sensor sizes of Digital cameras.
 Strangely enough, the width of the 35 mm format is 24 mm and its height is 36 mm.
 The proportions of this format, dividing by twelve to get the simplest ratio of integers, are therefore considered to be 3:2.
 The proportions of many of the formed comets are equal to or very close to this value.
 The much-abused and often derided rule of thirds is a simple guideline that creates dynamism while maintaining a measure of order within a composition.
 Second, according to this rule, the most effective place to position the main subject corresponds to the intersection of the lines that divide the image into thirds, both vertically and horizontally.
 In this phase of European history, the Catholic Church, having become rich and powerful, found itself under scrutiny.
 The religion of Christianity had acted as a glue between the European States for over a thousand years, despite linguistic and cultural differences.
 His omnipresent power has influenced everyone from the King to the common citizen.
 One of the foundations of Christianity is that wealth should be used to alleviate suffering and poverty, and that the church's monetary reserves exist for this very purpose.
 The central authority of the church remained in Rome for over a thousand years, and this convergence of power and money has led many to question whether this principle was respected.
 Soon after the outbreak of the war, Britain decided to enforce a naval blockade of Germany.
 The strategy proved effective: it involved the interruption of any military and civilian supplies, despite the fact that this blockade violated international law, as codified by multiple international treaties of the last two centuries.
 Britain mined international waters to prevent access by any ship to entire sections of the ocean, putting even neutral ships at risk.
 As this tactic had elicited a limited response, Germany expected a similar reaction to its campaign of unrestricted submarine warfare.
 In the twenties, the prevailing attitudes of most citizens and nations were pacifism and isolation.
 After witnessing the horrors and atrocities of World War I, nations desired to avoid a similar situation in the future.
 In 1884, Tesla accepted a job offer from the Edison company in New York City, and this led him to move to the United States.
 He arrived in the United States with four cents in his pocket, a book of poems, and a letter of recommendation from Charles Batchelor,
 In ancient China, the different periods of time were indicated in a very singular way: each period of China or each family that was in power constituted a specific dynasty.
 The period between the Han and the Jin dynasties is known as the Three Kingdoms period.
 In these periods, between many nobles in struggle for the throne, there were fierce wars.
 The period of the Three Kingdoms was one of the most violent in the history of ancient China, with thousands of people dying in battle to win a place of honor in the imposing Xi'an Palace.
 The social and political effects are numerous, among these we can cite the use of the metric system, the passage from absolutism to the Republic, nationalism, and the conviction that the nation belongs to the people and not to a single sovereign.
 In addition, after the Revolution, the professions were open to all candidates, men and women, allowing the most ambitious and fortunate to succeed.
 The same is true of the military, since rank in the Army, instead of being based on class,
 The French Revolution was a source of inspiration for many other oppressed workers in various countries to start their own revolutions.
 But Muhammad was deeply interested in questions that went beyond the life of this world.
 The cave, which has survived the passage of time, offers in itself a very clear image of Muhammad's spirituality.
 The cave is located on the top of one of the mountains north of Mecca, completely detached from the rest of the world.
 In reality, it's not at all easy to find, even though it's known to exist.
 There is nothing to be seen but a beautiful clear sky and a great deal of mountains around.
 Among the seven wonders of the world, the great pyramid of Giza is the only one that has survived to the present day,
 Built by the Egyptians in the third century B.C., the great pyramid is one of the great pyramid-shaped structures built in honor of a dead pharaoh.
 The plain of Giza, or the Giza Necropolis, in the Valley of the Kings in Egypt, is home to several pyramids,
 The important pyramid was created in honor of the pharaoh Cheops, and many of the smaller pyramids, tombs, and temples were built to honor the pharaoh's wives and family.
 The indication arc in su looks like a V, and the indication arc in giù looks like a staple or a square with the bottom side missing.
 Towards the top means that you should start from the tip and push the bow, and towards the bottom means that you should start from the alamaro,
 An upward bow generally produces a softer sound, while a downward bow produces a louder and more decided sound.
 You can decide to add your own personalized indications with a pencil, but keep in mind that the marks of the archeggio that you find printed have a musical value, so in line of mass they should be respected.
 On October 6, 1789, a crowd of market women forced King Louis XVI, in a state of terror, to leave Versailles and return to Paris, along with his wife, Marie Antoinette, their two young children, Marie-Therese, aged 11, and Louis-Charles, aged 4, and his sister, Elizabeth.
 They returned to Paris in a carriage, surrounded by a crowd of people who shouted and screamed threats against the sovereigns.
 The crowd forced the King and the queen to keep the windows of their carriage wide open.
 At one point, someone in the crowd showed the terrified queen the head of a Royal guard who had been killed at Versailles.
 The expenses of the United States government in conquering the Philippines have been paid by the Filipinos themselves.
 They were forced to pay taxes to the colonial regime of the United States to cover most of the expenses and the interest on the bonds fluctuated in the name of the Philippine government through the Wall Street banks.
 Clearly, the huge profits derived from the prolonged exploitation of the Filipino people formed the basis of U S. imperialism.
 In order to understand the Templars, we have to look at the context that led to their creation.
 The period in which the events took place is commonly called the early Middle Ages, the period of European history that covers the eleventh, twelfth, and thirteenth centuries.
 The high Middle Ages were preceded by the early Middle Ages and followed by the late Middle Ages, which ends conventionally around the year 1500.
 Determinism is a term that includes within its ambit a wide range of ideas, from technological innovation or the technological imperative to the narrow sense in which it is used to mean that the destiny of man is governed by a logos, a law, underlying it,
 The second is that the development of technology follows a course that is independent of political and cultural influences,
 For example, we may say that the automobile necessarily entails the development of a road network.
 However, a national road network for only a few cars is not economically sustainable, so new methods of production are being developed to reduce the costs of car ownership.
 The possession of mass-produced automobiles also leads to a greater percentage of accidents on the roads, and consequently the invention of new techniques for the care of injured people.
 The romanticism was characterized by a substantial component of cultural determinism, drawn from authors such as Goethe, Fichte, and Schlegel.
 In the framework of romanticism, geography has conditioned individuals, and over time, usages, customs and culture have arisen that, being in harmony with the context of the society, have proven more effective than laws imposed arbitrarily.
 Similarly, Constantinople, nowadays known as Istanbul, the capital of the Ottoman Empire, was the fashion capital of feudal Europe.
 Its notoriety as a center of luxury began around the year 400 and lasted until about 1100.
 During the twelfth century, its prestige declined, especially because the crusaders returned bringing gifts such as silk and spices, which were valued more than the goods that the Byzantine markets offered.
 At this point, the title of fashion capital shifted from Constantinople to Paris.
 The highest point of the Gothic style was reached between the tenth and eleventh centuries, and in the fourteenth century.
 Initially, the clothing was influenced by the Byzantine culture of the East.
 But the slowness of communication means that the diffusion of styles in the West can be delayed by 25 to 30 years.
 Towards the end of the Middle Ages, Western Europe began to develop its own style.
 Agriculture is defined as subsistence when it is practiced solely for the purpose of producing enough food to meet the needs of the farmer and his or her family.
 The subsistence agriculture is a simple system, usually of the biological type, which uses seeds originally conserved in the region and which are used in rotation of the crops or other relatively simple techniques aimed at getting the maximum from the harvest.
 Historically, most farmers practiced subsistence farming, and in many developing countries, it is still the case.
 Underground cultures unite individuals with the same opinions, who do not feel represented by the standards of society, allowing them to develop a sense of identity.
 Subcultures are distinguished by age, ethnicity, class, position and or sex of its members.
 The characteristics that define a subculture may be linguistic, aesthetic, religious, political, sexual, geographic, or a combination of factors.
 Often members of a subculture indicate their belonging through a peculiar and symbolic use of style, which includes fashions, manners, and slang.
 One of the most commonly used methods of explaining the importance of socialization is to analyze some unfortunate cases of children who, through neglect, accident, or the result of intentional abuse, have grown up without proper socialization with adults.
 These children are called feral or wild. Some of them have been segregated by people, often their own parents,
 Feral children may have suffered severe trauma or abuse before being abandoned or running away.
 Some of the children may have been raised by animals, others seem to have lived alone in the wild.
 When the feral child is totally raised by non-human animals, it shows behaviors, within the limits of its physical capabilities, that are almost entirely analogous to those of the particular animal that has taken care of it, such as fear or indifference towards humans.
 Learning based on projects should make learning itself easier and more interesting, while the scaffolding goes a bit beyond that.
 Scaffolding is not a method of learning, but rather a way of supporting someone who is undertaking a new learning experience, such as using a new computer program or starting a new project.
 The scaffolding can be both virtual and real, in other words, a teacher is an example of scaffolding, but so is the little Microsoft office word assisting tool.
 The virtual scaffolds are embedded in the software and have the purpose of questioning, prompting and explaining the procedures that the student may have had difficulty in managing on his own.
 The children are given up for adoption for various reasons, ranging from abandonment to abuse, if not even to extortion.
 A child should never grow up in an environment that does not provide nutrition, care, and education, but to them it happens.
 We believe that foster care is a safe zone for these children.
 Our foster care system should provide safe homes, loving foster parents, stable education and reliable health care.
 It is supposed that fostering will make up for all the needs not met in the home from which the child was removed.
 The Internet brings together some elements of both mass communication and interpersonal communication.
 The characteristic elements of the Internet lead to additional dimensions in terms of the theory of uses and gratifications.
 For example, as important motivations for using the Internet, learning and socialization are suggested.
 The Eighmey and McCord study of public reactions to Websites identified two new aspects of motivation, namely, personal involvement and continuing relationships.
 The use of Video-Recorded interviews has allowed for significant advances in the interpretation of Micro-Expressions, which are facial movements lasting only a few milliseconds.
 In the specific case, it is argued that you can detect if a person is lying by interpreting the micro expressions correctly.
 In his essay, the President, Oliver Sacks illustrated how people who are incapable of understanding spoken language,
 He even goes so far as to suggest that these abilities to interpret human behaviour may be shared with animals, such as dogs.
 In the twentieth century, research has demonstrated the existence of two pools of genetic variability, namely hidden and expressed variability.
 With mutation, a new genetic variability is added, with selection, it is eliminated from the pool of expressed variability.
 Generation after generation, segregation and recombination redistribute the variability forward and backward between the two pools.
 For a primate with a digestive apparatus similar to that of humans, it is difficult to meet their amino acid requirements with the vegetable resources available in the savanna.
 In addition, the failure to carry out these activities has serious consequences: slowed growth, malnutrition and, in the end, even death.
 The most readily accessible vegetable source would have been proteins in leaves and legumes, but for primates like us, they are difficult to digest, unless they are cooked.
 And the foods of the animal Kingdom, such as ants, termites, and eggs, are not only easy to digest, but they provide a high amount of protein, containing all the essential amino acids.
 In light of all this, it should come as no surprise that our own ancestors solved their own proteic problem in a certain sense, just like the Savannah chimpanzees do today.
 The interruption of sleep is the intentional process of waking that occurs during the normal period of sleep, followed by a return to sleep.
 This process can be easily put into practice using a relatively quiet alarm clock to bring you into a state of consciousness, without fully waking you.
 If you decide to reset the clock in the middle of the night, you can put it on the other side of the room so that you'll have to get out of bed to turn it off.
 Other biorhythm-focused options involve the consumption of many fluids before bedtime, especially water or tea, which is known for its diuretic properties,
 A person enjoys a peace of mind proportionate to the tension existing in his body and in his spirit.
 The less tension, the more positive the vital force that exists in each of us has the potentiality of finding absolute peace and contentment.
 Everyone can reach enlightenment, this goal is only hindered by our tension and our negativity.
 Tibetan Buddhism is based on the teachings of the Buddha, but it has been enriched by the love path of Mahayana and by various techniques of Indian yoga.
 In a nutshell, Tibetan Buddhism is very simple, founded on Kundalini Yoga, meditation, and a path of all-inclusive love.
 The Kundalini yoga activates the Kundalini energy through the use of yoga postures, breathing exercises, Mantras, and visualizations.
 The Deity Yoga is the fulcrum of Tibetan meditation, whereby the visualization of various deities cleanses the energy channels, activates the chakras and develops the consciousness of enlightenment.
 Germany was a common enemy in World War II, leading to the collaboration between the USSR and the United States.
 Two years after the end of the war, the allies of the past had become enemies, and the cold war began.
 It would last for the next 40 years and it would be fought by armies of mercenaries, in the battlefields from Africa to Asia, in Afghanistan, in Cuba, and many other places.
 On September 17, 1939, the Polish defense had already been broken through, and the only option was to retreat and reorganize along the Romanian bridgehead.
 These plans, however, proved obsolete almost immediately, when more than 800,000 Soviet Army troops advanced and created the Belorussian and Ukrainian fronts, after invading the eastern regions of Poland, violating the Riga peace treaty, the Soviet-Polish Non-Aggression Pact, and other bilateral and multilateral treaties.
 Using ships to transport goods is certainly the most efficient way to move large volumes of people and goods across the oceans.
 The Oyapock River Bridge is a cable-stayed bridge that spans the Oyapock River to link the cities of Oiapoque in Brazil and Saint-Georges de l'Oyapock in French Guiana.
 One of the most recent examples of this theory, and one of the most notable, is the battle of the Atlantic during World War II.
 At the same time, the German Navy, using mainly submarines, tried to disrupt this traffic.
 If the Allies had not succeeded, Germany would probably have been able to conquer Britain, as it had done in the rest of Europe.
 Goats were first domesticated about 10,000 years ago in the Zagros mountains of Iran.
 They were first raised by the cultures and tribes of antiquity to have readily available milk, wool, meat, and skin.
 Goats were usually raised in herds that were allowed to roam freely on hillsides or other grazing areas, often tended by shepherds, who were often children or teenagers.
 Already in the sixteenth century in England, wagonways were being built.
 Despite the fact that they were made up of parallel wooden rails, the wagonways, when compared to the slightly more accident-prone roads of the period, allowed the horses that travelled on them to reach greater speeds and to carry heavier loads.
 The sleepers were introduced relatively early to keep the rails in position, but gradually it was realised that the rails would be more efficient if they had a top bar of iron.
 It became a common practice, although the iron caused greater wear and tear on the wooden wheels of the cars.
 And finally, wooden wheels gave way to iron, and in 1767, the first completely iron rails were introduced.
 The first means of transportation that mankind has known are the legs. Humans began to walk upright two million years ago with the appearance of Homo Erectus, which means upright man.
 His predecessor, the Australopithecus, did not habitually walk upright.
 Signs of bipedalism are present in the Australopithecine fossils dating to 4.2-3.9 million years ago, although it is possible that Sahelanthropus walked on two legs as early as seven million years ago.
 We can start by adopting lifestyles that are more environmentally friendly, we can join the environmental movement, and we can also do activism.
 In many cases, this only works as a symptomatic treatment, but if we want a permanent solution, we should find the root cause and disable it.
 It is quite evident that the world has changed a great deal due to the scientific and technological progress of humanity, while the problems have increased due to overpopulation and the extravagant lifestyle of human beings.
 After the Congress adopted it on July 4, a handwritten draft signed by the President of the Congress, John Hancock, and the Secretary, Charles Thomson, was then sent to the printing press of John Dunlap, a few blocks away.
 Between 150 and 200 copies were produced in the night, and are now known as the Dunlap edition.
 The document was read publicly for the first time on July 8 in the Independence Hall courtyard, and the assignment was given to John Nixon.
 One was sent to George Washington on July 6, which he read to his troops in New York on July 9, while a copy reached London on August 10.
 The 25 Dunlap broadsides are the oldest extant copies of the document, and the original manuscript is lost.
 According to many modern day paleontologists, a category of dinosaurs is still surviving, and that category is the birds.
 Many people tend not to consider dinosaurs as dinosaurs because of the feathers and their ability to fly.
 And yet, birds have many characteristics in common with dinosaurs.
 Like the T-Rex, they have feet with claws and they lay eggs and walk on their hind legs.
 In the end, manipulating information coded in the form of Binary numbers is at the heart of all computers used today.
 A Binary number can only have one of two values, either 0 or 1, and in the technical language of computing, these numbers are called Binary digits or bits.
 The internal poisoning may not be immediately evident, and its symptoms, including vomiting, are very general, making it impossible to make an immediate diagnosis.
 The main indication of internal poisoning could be the presence in the house of an open container of drugs or of noxious chemicals.
 Check the label to see if there are first aid instructions for that specific poison.
 The term aphid is used formally by entomologists to refer to this group of insects.
 The term comes from the familiarity in ancient times with bed bugs, insects that have become highly adapted to become parasites of humans.
 Both bedbugs and assassin bugs are nidicolous, meaning they are adapted to live in the nest or home of their host.
 In the United States, multiple sclerosis affects about 400,000 people, making it the most common neurological disease in young and middle-aged adults.
 MS is a condition that affects the central nervous system, which includes the brain, spinal cord and optic nerve.
 Research has shown that the chances of developing MS are twice as high in women as in men.
 A couple may decide that raising a child is not in their best interest, or in the best interest of their own child.
 These couples have the option of choosing an adoption plan for their child.
 In an adoption, the natural parents give up their parental rights so that another couple can raise the child.
 The primary goal of science is to understand how the world works through the scientific method, which guides most of the scientific inquiry.
 But it is not only experimentation, since an experiment is a test that is used to exclude one or more of the possible hypotheses.
 Naturalists and philosophers focused on the classical texts, in particular, the Latin version of the Bible.
 The opinions of Aristotle on the various subjects of knowledge, including psychology, were accepted.
 With the progressive decline of the Greek language, the West was isolated from its Greek philosophical and scientific roots.
 In many, it has been observed, the physiological rhythms and behavior depend in a determinant way on the presence of endogenous cycles and on their production through biological clocks.
 There have been documented periodic rhythms, which are not only reactions to periodic external signals,
 Biological clocks are independent oscillators, whose free cycle continues for a period of time even in the absence of external stimuli.
 One of the first experiments to suggest DNA was a genetic material was the one conducted by Hershey and Chase.
 Hershey and Chase used bacteriophages, or viruses, to implant their own DNA into a bacterium.
 They performed two experiments, highlighting the DNA of the bacteriophage with radioactive phosphorus or the protein of the bacteriophage with radioactive sulphur.
 Mutations can have a range of different effects depending on the type of mutation, the relevance of the piece of genetic material involved and depending on whether the cells involved are in the germ line.
 The changes that can be passed on to the children are only those at the level of the germ cells,
 Naturalist tourism attracts people who are interested in visiting natural areas for the purpose of enjoying the scenery, including flora and fauna.
 Among the activities to be done on the spot are hunting, fishing, photography, birdwatching, visits to parks and the study of information regarding the ecosystem.
 For example, by visiting, photographing and learning about the orangutans of Borneo.
 Every morning, people leave the small towns of the countryside in their cars to go to work, and they meet other people whose place of work is the place from which they have just come.
 In this dynamic back and forth, everyone is in some way connected to a system of transportation that is based on private cars, which in turn supports them.
 Today, science reveals that this massive carbon-based economy has forced the biosphere outside of one of its stable conditions that allowed human evolution over the last two million years.
 Every person participates in the social life and uses the transportation systems, of which almost everyone complains.
 In the developed world, it's rare to hear complaints about the quality of water or about bridges that are falling down.
 Because transportation systems attract so many complaints, why are they being rejected every day?
 The traffic flow is the study of how vehicles and drivers move from one point to another and how they interact with each other.
 Unfortunately, the study of traffic flow is complex because the behavior of drivers cannot be predicted with absolute certainty.
 Fortunately, the behavior of drivers tends to fall within a reasonably constant range, so in turn, traffic flows tend to show a reasonably constant behavior and can be represented in a generic mathematical way.
 In order to get a more accurate representation of the traffic flow, the three main variables were correlated: (1) the flow,
 These relationships are useful in planning, designing, and managing roadway structures.
 Insects were the first animals to take to the air, and the ability to fly allowed them to escape enemies more easily and to find food and mates more efficiently.
 Most insects are advantageously able to fold their wings along their body.
 This allows them to exploit a wider variety of small crevices in which to hide from predators.
 Among all the insects that exist today, the only ones that cannot fold their wings are the dragonflies and the mayflies.
 Thousands of years ago, a man named Aristarchus claimed that the solar system moved around the sun.
 For some, it was right, but many others believed the opposite, that the solar system, including the sun,
 And the reason for that is that we don't have the sensation that the earth is moving,
 The Amazon River is the largest and second longest river in the world, carrying 8 times the amount of water that the second largest river carries.
 The Amazon River is also the widest river in the world, with a width that in some places reaches six miles.
 The total amount of water that flows from the Amazon River into the oceans is twenty percent of the total amount of water that flows from all the world's rivers into the oceans.
 The Amazon River is the largest in the world, with a length of 6,387 kilometers.
 Pyramids were built in stone until the end of the Old Kingdom, but despite this, the Giza pyramids were never surpassed in terms of size and technical excellence.
 The ancient New Kingdom Egyptians remained awestruck by the monuments of their ancestors, which at that time were much more than a thousand years old.
 The Vatican city state is the smallest independent country in the world, with a population of about eight hundred.
 The language of the Vatican City for legislation and official communications is Italian.
 Italian is also the everyday language spoken by most people who work within the state, while Latin is often used in religious functions.
 In the Vatican city, all citizens are Roman Catholics.
 The man began to know the basic chemical elements such as gold, silver and copper in the ancient times: these elements can be found in nature in a native form and it is possible to extract them in a fairly simple way with the help of primitive instruments.
 According to the philosopher Aristotle, everything is made up of a combination of one or more of the following four elements: earth, water, air, and fire.
 These in fact are more like the four states of matter, namely, solid, liquid, gaseous and plasma.
 The alloys are basically a mixture of two or more metals. Keep in mind that the periodic table contains many elements.
 The elements calcium and potassium are considered to be metals, although there are also metals like silver and gold.
 There may also be alloys composed of minute quantities of non-metallic elements, such as carbon.
 In the universe, everything is made of matter, and all matter is made up of tiny particles called atoms.
 Atoms are incredibly tiny, so tiny that trillions of them could fit into the point at the end of this sentence.
 After its invention, the pencil has proven to be a good friend to many.
 Unfortunately, with the introduction of new writing methods, the pencil has been relegated to a lesser status and to a use that is less and less common.
 Today, everyone writes messages on the screens of computers and never has to approach a thermometer.
 We can only wonder what the future holds for the keyboard when something new comes along.
 The principle that energy is required to bring together a nucleus with many protons and neutrons is at the heart of the fission bomb.
 In practice, it's like rolling a heavy cart up a hill, so by splitting the nucleus further,
 Some atoms have unstable nuclei, which means that they tend to break apart in the presence of a small or no push.
 The surface of the moon is made up of rocks and dust, and its outer layer is called the crust.
 The crust is about 70 km thick at the nearest point and about 100 km thick at the farthest point.
 It is thinner under the seas and thicker under mountainous areas.
 The Maria could be more numerous on the near side because the crust is thinner, allowing the lava to rise more easily to the surface.
 Theories on content are focused on the search for what satisfies or attracts individuals.
 According to these theories, people have certain needs and or desires that are internalized as they become adults.
 These theories analyze what it is that unites some people and pushes them to want to do what they do, and what are the factors of the context in which they live that pushes them to do or not to do certain things.
 Among the most widely accepted theories are Maslow's hierarchy of needs and Herzberg's two-factor theory.
 In general, when managers start to direct their former colleagues, there are two possible attitudes.
 The manager of this type finds it difficult to take unpopular decisions, to put in place disciplinary actions, to evaluate performance, to define and assign responsibilities.
 At the other extreme, the manager becomes a completely different person, who feels that he or she must change the whole team and make it their own.
 In the end, the leader is the person who is ultimately responsible for the success and failure of the team.
 This attitude often generates dissent between the leaders and the rest of the team.
 The standard of excellence for virtual teams is similar to that of conventional teams, but with some small differences.
 The members of the virtual team often serve as a point of contact for their next physical group.
 They often have greater autonomy than members of conventional teams, since matches may take place according to the various time zones, which may not be covered by the local management.
 The existence of a real invisibile team is also a fundamental element of a virtual team.
 This is the team that each member refers to and is the team that sets the standards for each member.
 And why would an organization want to go through the long process of building a learning organization?
 When all the resources available in all functional departments of an organization can be used effectively, creativity and ingenuity can emerge.
 And consequently, the path of collaboration within an organization to overcome an obstacle may lead to a new innovative process to meet the needs of the customer.
 For an organization to be innovative, leaders must create a culture of innovation, as well as shared knowledge and organizational learning.
 Angel, in 2006, illustrates the theory of the continuum as a method used to help organizations achieve higher levels of performance.
 Neurobiological results have demonstrated the physical existence of a theoretical approach to the investigation of cognition,
 The link between brain disease and behaviour is at the heart of the scientists' research.
 It has long been known that some types of brain damage, trauma, injury and tumors can influence behavior and modify certain mental functions.
 The introduction of new technologies allows us to see and investigate brain structures and processes that were never seen before.
 This gives us a huge amount of information and material to create simulation models that help us to understand our own mental processes.
 Despite having a strong science fiction connotation, AI is a very important branch of computer science that deals with intelligent behavior, learning, and adaptive machines.
 Ia research includes the creation of machines to automate tasks that require intelligent behavior.
 Some examples of application are control, planning and scheduling, the ability to respond to diagnoses and questions from clients, as well as the recognition of writing, vocal and facial.
 These things have become distinct disciplines, focusing on providing solutions to real-world problems.
 The IA system is nowadays used in economics, medicine, engineering and the military, as well as being integrated into several software applications for home computers and video games.
 Field trips are an important part of the curriculum, and teachers often want to take their students to places that are not accessible by bus.
 The solution is offered by virtual tours. Students can see museum artifacts, visit an aquarium, or admire beautiful works of art while sitting in their classroom.
 Sharing a virtual field trip is also a great excuse to share travel experiences and reflections with future classes.
 For example, every year the students of Bennet school in North Carolina design a Website about their trip to the capital,
 Blogs can also help to improve students' writing skills, as often their first experiences with Blogs are characterized by poor grammar and spelling, but the presence of an audience generally improves things.
 Since students are usually the most critical audience, the author of the Blog tries to improve his writing.
 Blogs also force students to become more aware of the moment they are living in.
 The Blog is a tool that aims to encourage collaboration and develop student learning beyond the normal school day.
 The correct use of Blogs can help students become more critical and analytical by actively responding to Internet materials, students can define their own position within the writings of others, as well as delineate their own perspectives on specific issues.
 Ottawa is the picturesque and bilingual capital of Canada, rich in art galleries and museums that tell the country's past and present.
 Further south are the Niagara falls and to the North, you can see the natural beauty and unspoiled wilderness of Muskoka and much more.
 All of this and more makes Ontario typically Canadian in the eyes of outsiders.
 The wide areas to the North are sparsely populated, and some of them are almost uninhabited.
 If you compare the population, the result may be surprising to many: in the United States, the number of African-American citizens is greater than that of Canadian citizens.
 The Islands of East Africa are located in the Indian ocean, off the East Coast of Africa.
 Madagascar is by far the largest and its natural heritage makes it a continent unto itself.
 Almost all of the smaller Islands, known as luxurious resorts, are mostly independent nations or associated with France.
 In the lands, the Arabs also brought Islam, which set out on a long journey to the Comoros and Mayotte.
 In the fifteenth century, the discovery of the Cape route, which went from Europe to India, by the Portuguese explorer Vasco da Gama, opened the way for European influence and colonialism.
 To the North, the region is bordered by the Sahel, while to the South and West it is bordered by the Atlantic Ocean.
 For travellers, it is recommended that all women declare themselves to be married, regardless of their actual marital status.
 It is also useful to wear a ring, though not one that is too costly.
 Women are advised to be aware that cultural differences may give rise to what they consider to be a molestation, and that it is not unusual to be followed, grabbed by the arm, etc.
 Have the courage to reject men, and don't be afraid to oppose them, regardless of cultural differences or not.
 The modern city of Casablanca was founded by Berber fishermen in the tenth century BC, under the name of Anfa, a port of strategic importance used by the Phoenicians, the Romans, and the Merinides.
 The Portuguese destroyed it and rebuilt it with the name of Casa Branca, which they abandoned in 1755 after a terrible earthquake.
 The Moroccan Sultan rebuilt the city, which was called Daru l-Badya, then Casablanca by the Spanish traders who chose these places for their commercial bases.
 In all of Morocco, Casablanca is one of the least interesting cities for shopping.
 In the old Medina, it is easy to find places that sell traditional Moroccan products, such as Tajin, ceramics, leather goods, narghilés and lots of chintz.
 Goma is a tourist city located in the eastern part of the Democratic Republic of the Congo, just across the border from Rwanda.
 In two thousand and two, the lava from the Nyiragongo volcano destroyed Goma, burying much of the city's roads, especially those in the centre.
 While Goma is reasonably safe, it is wise to research well before making any visits outside of Goma, in order to assess the state of the ongoing conflict in North Kivu province.
 The city is also the starting point for the ascent of the Nyiragongo volcano, in addition to being one of the least expensive opportunities to see the mountain gorillas of Africa.
 It is possible to use a boda-boda (taxi-motorcycle) to move around Goma. The normal price, in local currency, is about 500 Congolese francs for a short ride.
 Even in consequence of its relative inaccessibility, Timbuctoo has ended up becoming a metaphor for a distant, exotic land.
 Today, Timbuktu is a decadent city, but for its reputation it remains a tourist attraction, with an airport.
 In 1990 it was included in the list of Unesco world heritage sites that are in danger, because of the threat posed by the sands of the desert.
 In the PBS special, Henry Louis Gates, Jr. featured it as one of the main stops on his journey.
 With its Arabic-Like touch, the city stands out distinctly from the rest of the country.
 The Kruger National Park is located in northeastern South Africa, and stretches eastward along the border with Mozambique,
 With an area of 19,500 square kilometres, the park includes 14 different ecozones, each of which supports a different wildlife.
 The Kruger National Park is one of the most important tourist attractions in South Africa.
 As with all national parks in South Africa, there are daily conservation and entrance fees.
 The purchase of a Wildcard also may be useful, as it allows access to a selection of parks in South Africa or to all South African national parks.
 The island of Hong Kong, which gives its name to the entire territory, is a major tourist destination.
 The series of buildings that make up the skyline of Hong Kong has been compared to a scintillating bar graph, even more so because it is framed by the waters of Victoria Harbour.
 To enjoy the best views of Hong Kong, leave the island and visit the waterfront of Kowloon across the harbour.
 The majority of Hong Kong's urban development has been concentrated on the reclaimed land of the northern coast, which is densely populated.
 This is the place that the British colonists chose for themselves, so if you're looking for evidence of the colonial past of this land, this is a good place to start.
 The Sundarbans are the largest mangrove forest in the world, extending 80 km from the coast of Bangladesh and India.
 The Sundarbans have been designated a UNESCO world heritage site. The part of the Sundarbans that is in India is called Sundarbans National Park.
 However, the forests are not only made up of mangrove swamps, but also contain what remains of the once-immense jungles that covered the Ganges plain.
 The Sundarbans cover an area of 3,850 km², of which about one third is made up of swampy areas.
 Since 1966 the Sundarbans have been a sanctuary for wildlife, with an estimated 400 Bengal tigers and about 30,000 spotted deer.
 Buses leave from the inter-district bus station (on the other side of the river) throughout the day, although many of them, especially those going east and to Jakar/Bumthang, leave between 06:30 and 07:30.
 Since buses between districts are often full, it is best to buy the ticket a few days in advance.
 The majority of the districts are served by comfortable and robust Japanese-Style small buses.
 Shared taxis are a convenient and fast way to reach nearby locations, including Paro (150 Nu) and Punakha (200 Nu).
 The bridge over the Oyapock River is a suspension bridge that joins the city of Oiapoque, Brazil, to Saint-Georges de l'Oyapock, in French Guiana.
 Its two masts are 83 meters high, it is 378 meters long and has two lanes 3.50 meters wide.
 Under the bridge, the vertical clearance is 15 meters, and the construction was finished in August 2011, but the opening to traffic only took place in March 2017.
 By September 2017, when Brazilian customs checkpoints are likely to be fully operational, the bridge should be fully functional.
 The Guarani were the most important indigenous group living in what is now Eastern Paraguay.
 The region of the Chaco was inhabited by other indigenous groups like the Guaycuru and the Payaguá, who lived by hunting, gathering and fishing.
 Paraguay, formerly called the great province of the Indies, was founded in the sixteenth century by the encounter of Spanish conquerors and indigenous natives.
 The Spanish gave rise to a period that lasted three centuries, the period of the colonizations.
 From the foundation of Asuncion in 1537, Paraguay has been able to maintain much of its identity and its own peculiarities.
 Argentina, of course, has one of the best polo teams and players in the world.
 In December, at the Las Cañitas polo grounds, the most important tournament of the year takes place.
 You can watch minor tournaments and matches at other times of the year.
 For information on tournaments and the purchase of tickets for polo matches, please contact the Asociacion Argentina de Polo.
 The Falkland Islands have their own official currency, the Falkland Islands pound, which is equivalent in value to the British pound sterling.
 The only bank in the Islands, situated in Stanley opposite the FIC West shop, offers currency exchange.
 British pounds are generally accepted everywhere on the Islands, and Stanley often accepts credit cards and U S . dollars.
 It is likely that in the outer Islands credit cards will not be accepted, although British and U S. dollars may be accepted.
 It is almost impossible to exchange Falkland Islands currency outside the Islands, so change your money before you leave.
 Since Montevideo is south of the equator, it is summer when in the northern hemisphere it is winter, and vice versa.
 And Montevideo is situated in the subtropical region, so during the summer months, temperatures of over thirty degrees Celsius are quite normal.
 The winter can be deceptively cold, rarely does the temperature drop below zero, but the combination of wind and humidity gives the impression of a temperature lower than that indicated by the thermometer.
 There are no defined seasons of drought and rain, the amount of rain remains almost constant throughout the year.
 Even though many of the park's animals are used to seeing people, the wildlife is still wild and should not be fed or disturbed.
 Authorities of the park recommend that you maintain a distance of at least 100 yards from bears and wolves and a distance of 25 yards from all other wild animals.
 No matter how docile they may seem, bison, elk, deer, bears, practically all large animals can attack.
 Every year, dozens of visitors are injured by not maintaining an adequate distance.
 And keep in mind that odors can attract bears and other wildlife, so avoid bringing or cooking foods with very strong odors.
 Apia is the capital of the Samoan Islands, situated on the island of Upolu, with a population of just under 40,000.
 Apia was founded between 1850 and 1860 and is the official capital of Samoa since 1959.
 In this port, the notorious naval standoff of 1889 occurred, in which seven ships from Germany, the United States, and Britain refused to leave the port.
 All but one of the British ships were sunk, and nearly 200 American and German lives were lost.
 In the course of the Mau movement, a peaceful rally in the city led to the killing of Tupua Tamasese Lealofi III, the Supreme Chief.
 There are many beaches, as Auckland is situated between two harbours, the most popular being divided into three areas.
 The beaches of the North Shore, facing the Pacific Ocean, extend from Long Bay in the North to Devonport in the South.
 These are mainly sandy beaches, safe for swimming, and most of them enjoy the shade of the pohutukawa trees.
 The beaches of Tamaki Drive in Auckland central, in the elegant suburbs of Mission Bay and St Heliers, overlook Waitemata harbour.
 These are family-friendly beaches, sometimes a bit crowded, surrounded by a wide range of shops.
 The most popular local beer is a simple, pleasant, and refreshing beer called Number One.
 There are many French wines, but Australian and New Zealand wines could be better suited to the journey.
 The tap water is totally safe to drink, but if you're worried, bottled water is easy to find.
 According to Australians, the flat white coffee is a foreign idea.
 Hot chocolate is at the same level as the Belgian one, and the fruit juices are expensive, but very good.
 Throughout the year, many coral reef diving trips are made, and injuries from these are rare.
 Always seek advice from the authorities, follow the instructions and pay particular attention to safety notices.
 Cubomedusae appear from October to April near the beaches and estuaries of the rivers north of Seventeen Seventy.
 Sharks are present, but rarely attack humans, and most sharks are afraid of humans and tend to keep their distance.
 The habitat of saltwater crocodiles is mainly constituted by the estuaries of the rivers north of Rockhampton, and they do not actively live in the ocean.
 By booking in advance, the traveler has the serenity of finding a place to sleep once they arrive at their destination.
 Travel agencies often have deals with certain hotels, but it is still possible to book other forms of accommodation, such as camping, through the same agencies.
 Travel agencies generally offer packages that include breakfast, transfers to and from the airport, or even a combination of flight and hotel.
 They can also hold the reservation for you if you need time to think about the offer or to get additional documents for your destination, such as a visa.
 However, any changes or requests must be made prior to the travel agent and not directly to the hotel.
 In some music festivals, the majority of participants decide to camp on the spot, considering this aspect a crucial element of the experience.
 To be close to the center of the action, it is necessary to arrive early and to secure a space near the music.
 Once the music on the main stages is finished, there may be sections of the festival where the music continues late into the night.
 Some festivals have special camping areas for families with small children.
 If you're crossing the Baltic in winter, check the location of your cabin, as the crossing of the ice can make a lot of noise.
 Cruises to St . Petersburg include the time to be spent exploring the city. Cruise passengers are granted visa-free entry.
 Casinos generally do everything they can to increase the amount of time and money spent by their guests.
 They usually offer food, drinks and exclusive entertainment to keep the mood of the guests high and to keep them from leaving.
 In some places, alcoholic beverages are offered by the house, but the intoxication of the players is a factor that can alter their judgment.
 Anyone who decides to drive at high altitudes or on mountain passes must take into consideration the possibility of snow, ice or temperatures close to zero.
 On icy, snowy roads, the friction is reduced and it is not possible to drive as well as on a clean asphalt road.
 During a blizzard, in a very short time, so much snow can fall that you may be stranded.
 The precipitation and the winds, or the formation of ice or condensation on the vehicle's windows, can reduce visibility.
 However, ice and snow are normal conditions in many countries, and traffic continues to flow almost uninterruptedly throughout the year.
 Safaris are probably the largest tourist attraction in Africa and the focus of many visitors' holidays.
 In popular usage, the term safari refers to overland trips, particularly in the savanna, to see the beautiful wildlife of Africa.
 Some animals, such as elephants and giraffes, tend to come closer to the car, so a normal camera setup is sufficient to get a good view.
 Lions, cheetahs, and Leopards are sometimes timid, and for this reason it is possible to observe them better with a binocular.
 A walking safari is a type of safari in which participants walk on foot, rather than ride in a vehicle.
 The Paralympics will be held from August 24 to September 5, 2012, and some of the events will be held in other locations throughout Japan.
 Tokyo will be the only Asian city to have hosted two Olympic summer games, the first of which took place in 1964.
 If your booking for flights and accommodation for 2020 was made before the postponement was announced, you may find yourself in a difficult situation.
 The policies vary, however, most of the cancellation policies related to the Coronavirus at the end of March 2020, do not arrive until July 2020, when the Olympics are scheduled.
 The cost of most event tickets is expected to be between 2,500 yuan and 130,000 yuan, while the normal tickets will cost around 7,000 yuan.
 Stirring wet clothes can help them to dry faster, and many hotels offer the use of an iron and ironing board, even if they are not in the room.
 If you don't have an iron, or if you don't like wearing ironed socks, you can try using a hair dryer, if you have one.
 Prestate attention to not exposing the tissues to too high a temperature, in order to avoid shrinkage or, in the worst case, burns.
 There are various ways to sanitize water, and some of these are more effective against specific risks.
 In some areas, it is sufficient to boil the water for a minute, in others, it takes many minutes.
 The effectiveness of filters is variable, so in case of doubts it is advisable to evaluate the purchase of water packaged inside sealed bottles coming from a reliable company.
 Travellers may come into contact with animal parasites that are not found in their home regions.
 Parasites can spoil food, cause irritation, or in the worst case, cause allergic reactions, and transmit disease.
 The same infectious diseases and dangerous animals that can injure or kill people with their strength are not usually classified as dangerous.
 Duty-Free shopping is an opportunity to buy tax-free products in certain locations.
 Travellers heading to countries with high taxes can sometimes save a lot, especially on things like alcohol and tobacco.
 The Buffalo-Pittsburgh highway between Point Marion and Fairmont is the one that has the most difficult driving conditions,
 If you're not used to driving on country roads, it's best to keep your eyes open, as there are steep gradients, narrow lanes and sharp bends.
 The speed limits posted are decidedly lower than those applied in the preceding and following stretches of road,
 Strangely, though, in this area the level of mobile phone coverage is much higher than in other parts of the Pennsylvania Wilds.
 German desserts are quite good, and in Bavaria they are quite tasty and varied, similar to those of nearby Austria.
 Fruit desserts are a timeless classic, from apples to peaches, from pears to cherries,
 Several German pastries also contain almonds, hazelnuts, and other nuts. The most popular cakes are often accompanied by a cup of strong coffee.
 Those who want to taste small but richly flavored cakes can look for those that, depending on the region, are called Berliner, Pfannkuchen or Krapfen.
 Curry is a dish prepared with herbs and spices combined with meat or vegetables.
 The curry may be served either as a dry or a wet dish, depending on the amount of liquid contained.
 In northern India and Pakistan, for curry in the interior regions, yogurt is normally used, while in Southern India and in some other coastal regions of the subcontinent, coconut milk is more commonly used.
 Given the presence of 17,000 Islands to choose from, the term Indonesian cuisine is a generic term that covers a wide variety of regional cuisines found in the country.
 However, when used without further specification, the term generally indicates foods originating in the central and eastern part of the main island, Java.
 The cuisine of Java, now widely diffused throughout the archipelago, offers a series of dishes of simple preparation,
 The stirrups are footrests for the rider and are attached to the two sides of the saddle.
 They guarantee greater stability to the rider but can present safety problems if the rider's feet become trapped.
 If a jockey is thrown from a horse but has a foot caught in the stirrup, he could be dragged along by the horse as it runs.
 First, most of the riders wear riding boots with a heel and a sole that is quite thin and smooth.
 Some saddles, especially English ones, have since added safety bars, which cause a leather strap to break when the rider pulls it back in a fall.
 Cochamó Valley, the most important destination for climbing in Chile, known as the Yosemite of South America, where there are a great number of enormous granite walls and cliffs.
 The peaks of the mountains include breathtaking views, and climbers from all over the world continually trace new routes up its sheer cliffs, potentially endless.
 The sports of downhill skiing and snowboarding are very popular and involve sliding down a slope on skis or a snowboard.
 Skiing is one of the main tourist activities and boasts many enthusiasts, sometimes even called ski bums, who dedicate entire periods of vacation to skiing in a particular skiing area.
 The earliest paintings of humans skiing date back to 5000 BC.
 Skiing as a sport originated at least in the seventeenth century, and in 1861 the first recreational ski club was opened in Australia by Norwegians.
 Ski touring, also known as backcountry skiing, is the act of skiing or snowboarding off-piste.
 It is linked, although usually not comprised of, to ski touring or skimo, which are practiced on steep and rocky terrain and require much stiffer skis and boots.
 Think of the ski slope as a hiking trail.
 If the conditions are good, you can cover distances that are somewhat greater than walking, but only very rarely will you reach the speeds of cross-country skiing without a heavy pack on beaten tracks.
 Europe is a relatively small continent, but made up of many independent countries, so you will usually need to apply for a visa and go through passport control multiple times.
 However, in this regard, the Schengen area works more like a single country.
 If you remain within the Schengen area, normally you can go from one border to the other without having to go through passport control again.
 In the same way, if you have a Schengen visa, you do not need to apply for individual visas to the Member States,
 There is no universal definition of what makes an item an antique, some tax agencies consider an item to be an antique if it is at least 100 years old.
 The definition has geographic differences, as in the case of North America, where the age limit may be lower.
 Craftsmen's items could be defined as antiques, even if they are more recent than similar mass-produced items.
 Reindeer herding is an important source of livelihood for the Sámi, and the culture around this trade is also the basis for many other professions.
 Even in the course of time, not all Sámi have been involved in large-scale reindeer herding, some lived on fishing, hunting and similar activities, using reindeer mainly as work animals.
 Today, many Sámi people work in modern professions, and tourism is an important source of income in Sápmi, the Sámi homeland.
 Even though it is used a lot, particularly among non-Roma, the word Zingaro is often considered offensive because it is associated with negative stereotypes and a misperception of Roma.
 If a travel warning is issued for the destination you are visiting, there may be consequences for your travel insurance or your travel cancellation insurance.
 The United States, for example,
 For example, American citizens in the Middle East may encounter different situations than Europeans or Arabs.
 The bulletins are simply a brief summary of the political situation in a country.
 The opinions reported are often superficial, general, and simplistic compared to the more detailed information available elsewhere.
 Weather warnings are the general term for any dangerous weather phenomenon that may cause damage, serious social disruption or loss of life.
 In every part of the world, extreme weather can occur, and there are different types, depending on geography, topography, and atmospheric conditions.
 Strong winds, hail, above-normal precipitation and uncontrolled fires are manifestations and consequences of adverse meteorological conditions, such as thunderstorms, tornadoes, sea-going cyclones and hurricanes.
 Among the most extreme regional and seasonal phenomena are thunderstorms, blizzards, ice storms, and dust storms.
 We recommend that travelers check the weather conditions that may affect their area, as they may affect the planning of their trip.
 Anyone planning to visit a potentially war-torn country should undertake professional training.
 By searching on the Internet for a course on hostile environments, you're likely to find the address of a local company.
 A course will normally cover all the issues discussed here in much more detail, usually by using practical experience.
 A course typically lasts from 2 to 5 days and includes role-playing games, as well as many first aid and sometimes weapons training activities.
 Books and magazines about survival in the wild are plentiful, while there are few publications dealing with war zones.
 Travellers who are planning to have surgery abroad to change their gender must ensure they have the right travel documents for their return journey.
 The intention of governments to issue passports without gender indication, or to update documents to match a person's preferred gender, varies.
 And the availability of such documents varies from one government to another.
 Inspections at security controls have also become much more scrupulous in the post 11 September 2001 era.
 Transgender people in the pre-operative phase should not expect to pass through the controls without their privacy and dignity being compromised.
 The tidal currents are the result of the return flow of the waves that break on the shore, often near a coral reef or similar formation.
 And because of the topography, the return flow is concentrated in some of the deeper sections where it can form a strong current.
 The majority of deaths occur as a result of exhaustion in the attempt to swim against the current, which can be impossible.
 As soon as you are out of the current, it will be easier to return to swimming than it was before.
 Try to identify a zone where you are unlikely to be trapped again, or consider waiting for help based on your abilities and whether you have been spotted.
 The shock from returning home is shorter than the shock from culture shock,
 Travellers who have found it easy to adapt to the new culture sometimes have difficulty in readapting to the culture of their own country.
 When you return home after living abroad, you will have adapted to the new culture and lost some of the ways of your home culture.
 In the first experience abroad, it is likely that you have encountered patient and understanding people, aware of the fact that travelers in a new country need to adapt.
 Many people did not imagine that patience and awareness were necessary even for those returning home.
 The show of lights and sounds at the pyramid is one of the most interesting things for children.
 Before the show begins, you will be able to admire the pyramids in the darkness and silence.
 You can always hear the noise of tourists and vendors, and the show of lights and sounds is like a book of stories.
 The Sphinx becomes the background and narrator of a long tale.
 The scenes are projected onto the pyramids, and each pyramid is illuminated.
 The Shetland Islands, discovered in 1819, have the highest number of bases, sixteen of which are active in 2020.
 The archipelago is 120 kilometers north of the peninsula, and King George Island is the largest and site of the town of Villa Las Estrellas.
 Among the other Islands are Livingston Island and Deception Island, the latter of which is the caldera of an active volcano.
 The Ellsworth land is the region that lies to the south of the peninsula and overlooks the Bellingshausen sea.
 Here the mountains of the peninsula merge into the high plateau, and then re-emerge to form the Ellsworth mountains, a 360-kilometre-long chain that is bisected by the Minnesota glacier.
 The northern part, known as the Sentinel Range, boasts the highest mountains in Antarctica, the Vinson Massif, which reaches 4,892 m with Mount Vinson.
 In remote areas, where there is no mobile phone coverage, a satellite phone may be the only viable alternative.
 A satellite phone is not generally a substitute for a cell phone, because in order to make a call, one must be outdoors with a clear view to the satellite.
 The service is often used by pleasure craft, including those from the yachting and pleasure craft, as well as by missions that have a need for data and voice at a distance.
 Your local telephone service provider should be able to give you more information about connecting to this service.
 One of the most popular options for those who plan to take a gap year is to travel and learn.
 Particularly among recent graduates, since they can take a year off before starting university without compromising their education.
 In many cases, enrolling in a course abroad during the sabbatical year can actually increase the chances of resuming higher education upon return to the home country.
 Usually the enrollment in these educational programs requires the payment of a fee.
 Finland is the ideal destination for those who love to sail. In the land of a thousand lakes, there are also thousands of islands, both within the lakes and in the coastal archipelagos.
 It's not just for the yachts, though, and an experiment is a test that is used to eliminate one or more of the possible hypotheses, asking questions, and making observations also guide scientific research.
 Even though the archipelagoes and the bigger lakes are certainly large enough for any yacht, the smaller boats or even a kayak offer a different experience.
 Boating is the national pastime in Finland, where there is one boat for every seven or eight people.
 In Norway, Sweden and New Zealand, this is also the case, but in general it is a rather singular phenomenon.
 A large part of the different Baltic cruises includes a stay of several days in St . Petersburg, Russia.
 You can spend two full days in the historic town, returning to the ship in the evening to sleep.
 For the return trip, no separate visa will be required using the ship's shore excursions.
 Some brochures also offer cruises to Berlin, Germany, as you can see from the map above, Berlin is not near the sea, and the visit to the city is not included in the price of the cruise.
 Travelling by airplane can be scary for people of all ages and conditions, especially if they've never flown before or have had some traumatic experience.
 There is nothing to be ashamed of in this, for it is no different from the fears and aversions which many people manifest towards other things.
 For some people, understanding a bit about how planes work and what happens during a flight can help them to overcome a fear based on what they don't know or on the fact that they don't have control.
 The couriers are well paid to deliver goods quickly, and often the timing is very important, such as in the case of business documents, goods, or parts for an urgent repair.
 For some routes, the larger companies used their own planes, but for other routes and for smaller companies, there were problems.
 On some routes, air shipments would have taken days for unloading and customs.
 The only way to get it there faster would be to ship it as cargo, and that's where you come in, since airline regulations don't allow baggage to be shipped without a passenger.
 The most obvious way to fly first or business class is to pay a lot of money for the privilege.
 However, the price to be paid is high: you can expect to pay up to four times the normal economy fare for a Business class ticket, and up to eleven times the normal economy fare for a First class ticket.
 In general, on direct flights from A to B, it's not even worth looking for deals on first or business class seats.
 Airlines know that there is a category of travelers who are willing to pay a lot of money for the privilege of arriving quickly and comfortably at their destination, and as a result, they apply certain fares.
 The capital of Moldova is Chisinau, and the local language is Romanian, although Russian is also widely spoken.
 The Moldavian Republic is a Multi-Ethnic country that has been the scene of an ethnic conflict in the past.
 In 1994, the conflict led to the creation of the self-proclaimed Transnistrian Republic in the eastern part of Moldova, with its own government and currency, but not recognized by any UN member state.
 Despite the failure of the political negotiations, economic relations between these two parts of Moldova have been restored.
 The predominant religion in Moldova is the Christian Orthodox religion.
 Smirna is the third largest city in Turkey, with a population of about 3.7 million people, and is the second largest port after Istanbul.
 The ancient city of Ephesus is built on a huge Bay, surrounded by mountains, and is now a modern, evolved, and active commercial center.
 Although the city has a Mediterranean atmosphere, with wide avenues, glass facades and modern shopping centres, it is dotted with characteristic red-tiled roofs, the eighteenth-century market, mosques and ancient churches.
 In the village of Haldarsvik you can enjoy beautiful views of the nearby island of Eysturoy and you can visit a singular octagonal church.
 In the churchyard, on some of the tombs, are interesting marble sculptures of doves.
 A half-hour is sufficient to walk around the enchanting village.
 To the North is the romantic and enchanting city of Sintra, easily reached, which has become famous in the eyes of foreigners thanks to the brilliant tale of its splendours written by Lord Byron.
 The bus service Scotturb 403 regularly connects with Sintra, and stops at Cabo da Roca.
 Always to the North, visit the great sanctuary of the Virgin of Fatima, a place of Marian apparitions famous throughout the world.
 Remember that the site you are visiting is basically a mass grave, and has a meaning that is virtually incalculable to a large part of the world's population.
 There are still many men and women surviving in these places, and many others who have seen their own loved ones murdered or made to work until they die, both Jews and non-Jews.
 Treat the place with all the dignity, seriousness, and respect it deserves.
 Avoid defacing these places by marking the structures with graffiti.
 In the city of Barcelona, the official languages are Catalan and Spanish, with about half of the population preferring to speak Catalan, and the vast majority being able to understand it.
 However, the majority of the signs are written in Catalan, which is the official first language.
 The Spanish language, however, is widely used for public transportation and other services.
 In the Metro, regular announcements are only in Catalan, and any unscheduled service interruptions are communicated in a wide variety of languages, including Spanish, English, French, Arabic and Japanese, thanks to an automated system.
 Parisians are said to be egocentric, rude and arrogant.
 But even if it's only a stereotype, the best way to feel at home in Paris is to behave as a well-bred person would,
 The rough exterior of the Parisians will vanish quickly if you show some basic good manners.
 The Plitvice Lakes National Park is rich in forests, mostly of beech, fir and spruce.
 Thanks to a multiplicity of microclimates, soils and altitude levels, it presents a great variety of plant communities.
 The area also hosts a great variety of animal and bird species.
 In these places live rare species such as the European Brown bear, the wolf, the Eagle, the Owl, the Lynx, the Wildcat and the capercaillie, alongside several other animal species that are more widespread.
 When visiting monasteries, women are required to wear skirts that cover their knees and to cover their shoulders.
 Most monasteries will lend you a stole for the women who arrive unprepared, but if you have one, especially if it's a brightly colored one, you'll get a smile from the monk or nun at the entrance.
 In a similar way, men are required to wear long pants that extend to just below the knee.
 These can also be borrowed from the warehouse at the entrance, but the clothes are not washed after every user, so you may not feel comfortable wearing these skirts.
 The cuisine of the Balearic Islands, like that of similar Mediterranean areas, is based on bread, vegetables and meat,
 Pa amb oli is a simple, popular dish, typical of the summer season: bread with olive oil, tomato and all the condiments that can be found, such as cheese, tuna, etc.
 All nouns, in addition to the pronoun Sie, which is used for the formal you, begin with a capital letter, even if they appear in the middle of a sentence.
 This represents an important mechanism for distinguishing between certain verbs and complements.
 This aspect probably also facilitates reading, although the need to understand whether a verb or an adjective is used in a substantivized form makes the writing rather complex.
 The Italian pronunciation is relatively simple from the fact that most words are pronounced just as they are written.
 The main letters to pay attention to are the c and the g, since their pronunciation changes based on the vowel that follows.
 And make sure you pronounce the Rs differently, so that caro means dear and carro means cart.
 The Persian language is a relatively simple and most of the time regular language.
 Therefore, reading this basic grammar manual could help you a lot with Persian grammar and understanding Persian sentences.
 It goes without saying that if one already knows a Romance language, learning Portuguese will be easier.
 However, people with a minimal knowledge of the Spanish language may come to the precipitous conclusion that Portuguese is quite similar and therefore need not be studied separately.
 Usually, pre-modern observers are obsolete and serve as museums or educational sites.
 Since light pollution in their heyday was not a problem as it is today, they are usually located in the cities or on campuses, which are more easily accessible than those built in modern times.
 The majority of modern research telescopes are huge structures in remote areas where the atmospheric conditions are favourable.
 The admiration of the cherry blossom, known as hanami, has been part of Japanese culture since the eighth century.
 The concept originated in China, where it was preferred to the blooming of the plum trees.
 In Japan, the first cherry blossom festivals were organized by the Emperor only for himself and other members of the aristocracy close to the Imperial court.
 Plants give their best when they are in their natural environment, so resist the temptation to take even just one.
 If you visit an Italian garden, even picking a few plants will cost you the removal from this place, without discussion.
 In general, Singapore is a very safe and easy city to get around in, and you can buy pretty much anything once you arrive.
 But being in the high tropics, only a few degrees north of the equator, you'll have to contend with the heat and the sun, which is always strong,
 Some buses also go north to Hebron, the traditional place where the patriarchs Abraham, Isaac, and Jacob and their wives are buried.
 Make sure the bus you want to take reaches the interior of Hebron and does not stop at the nearby Jewish settlement of Kiryat Arba.
 The courses of the interior can be a great theme around which to organize a vacation.
 For example, one can visit the castles in the Loire Valley and the Rhine Valley, take a cruise to visit the interesting cities on the Danube, or sail on the Erie Canal.
 They also define the routes of hiking trails and bicycle paths that are well known.
 The Christmas holiday is one of the most important holidays in the Christian religion.
 And the majority of people in the world are not Christians,
 A tradition is to spend the Easter night awake in an open place to watch the dawn.
 There are, of course, theological explanations for this tradition, but it could just as well be a pre-Christian fertility rite.
 In the more traditional churches, a Paschal vigil is often held on the Saturday night of the Easter weekend, with congregations often beginning the service at midnight to celebrate the resurrection of Christ.
 All the animals that originally came to the Islands arrived by swimming, flying, or by floating.
 Because the distance from the mainland was considerable, the mammals could not make the journey, and this made the giant tortoise the main animal on the Galapagos.
 Several mammals have been introduced to the Galapagos Islands, such as goats, horses, cows, rats, dogs, and cats.
 If you visit the Arctic or Antarctic during the winter, you will experience the polar night, when the sun remains below the horizon.
 This phenomenon offers the possibility of observing the aurora borealis, because the sky remains dark almost all day.
 The territory is sparsely populated, and light pollution is often not a problem, so you can enjoy the stars.
 In Japan, the culture of work is more hierarchical and formal than what Westerners tend to be used to.
 The dress code for office workers consists of a suit and tie, and one addresses colleagues by their surname or by their professional title.
 The importance of the workplace is crucial, as it gives importance to the group's effort rather than to the individual's achievements.
 The workers must often receive the approval of their superiors in regard to every decision, and they are expected to follow instructions without question.
Results bleu: {'bleu': 0.2881841428893671, 'precisions': [0.6098990556821882, 0.3510782815418577, 0.22431689141234917, 0.14722273825004645], 'brevity_penalty': 0.993791738235651, 'length_ratio': 0.9938109299785607, 'translation_length': 24568, 'reference_length': 24721} results chrF: {'score': 56.532527895064746, 'char_order': 6, 'word_order': 0, 'beta': 2} results comet:{'mean_score': 0.849141980966796, 'scores': [0.8097806572914124, 0.8197013735771179, 0.8958757519721985, 0.602303147315979, 0.6606613993644714, 0.7570714354515076, 0.8920934796333313, 0.8977516889572144, 0.8882469534873962, 0.8675634860992432, 0.8284238576889038, 0.9097139239311218, 0.901828944683075, 0.7976978421211243, 0.891933262348175, 0.785163164138794, 0.8778015375137329, 0.824574887752533, 0.9099838137626648, 0.8491692543029785, 0.9315496683120728, 0.7570520043373108, 0.8277986645698547, 0.7801148891448975, 0.8591579794883728, 0.915443480014801, 0.8749455809593201, 0.8787887692451477, 0.8238752484321594, 0.9000549912452698, 0.8067470192909241, 0.6243976950645447, 0.8291762471199036, 0.9166643023490906, 0.943879246711731, 0.8781086802482605, 0.8997535705566406, 0.9153965711593628, 0.879876434803009, 0.9367089867591858, 0.9088402390480042, 0.9457396864891052, 0.9159110188484192, 0.8964741826057434, 0.7668909430503845, 0.7657540440559387, 0.889254093170166, 0.8663169741630554, 0.8989165425300598, 0.823475182056427, 0.8865188360214233, 0.9196851849555969, 0.9094764590263367, 0.9351505637168884, 0.8982584476470947, 0.8854648470878601, 0.8613675236701965, 0.8738099932670593, 0.9165071845054626, 0.9308512210845947, 0.8920379281044006, 0.9086080193519592, 0.8486079573631287, 0.8986027836799622, 0.876168429851532, 0.8867557644844055, 0.8779467344284058, 0.8445219397544861, 0.903403639793396, 0.8763430714607239, 0.8837760090827942, 0.8470431566238403, 0.8249765634536743, 0.8475067019462585, 0.8777902722358704, 0.7321633696556091, 0.8807790279388428, 0.8781406879425049, 0.9229956269264221, 0.8915131688117981, 0.8904500603675842, 0.8770288825035095, 0.8026155829429626, 0.869743824005127, 0.9082467555999756, 0.8362906575202942, 0.6904855370521545, 0.8678833842277527, 0.9058405756950378, 0.7807161211967468, 0.7439932227134705, 0.8398107886314392, 0.8786713480949402, 0.8861997723579407, 0.9056147336959839, 0.9315275549888611, 0.8133751749992371, 0.817600429058075, 0.8990170955657959, 0.8502563834190369, 0.8927387595176697, 0.8833625316619873, 0.8830724358558655, 0.9028034210205078, 0.884279191493988, 0.8957224488258362, 0.8343083262443542, 0.8841586112976074, 0.7963759303092957, 0.6566362380981445, 0.8760748505592346, 0.9317626953125, 0.9052674174308777, 0.9213001728057861, 0.8552778959274292, 0.7806193232536316, 0.8732791543006897, 0.8856436610221863, 0.9382185339927673, 0.719444751739502, 0.5472440123558044, 0.8637945652008057, 0.8809931874275208, 0.831108570098877, 0.91514652967453, 0.467913419008255, 0.89777672290802, 0.909784197807312, 0.9032113552093506, 0.9155757427215576, 0.8735659718513489, 0.8667969107627869, 0.8781877160072327, 0.8840315937995911, 0.8987058997154236, 0.8639967441558838, 0.8776304125785828, 0.8944586515426636, 0.9092939496040344, 0.8049522042274475, 0.8866303563117981, 0.9013046622276306, 0.9158784747123718, 0.5712363123893738, 0.8565266728401184, 0.8785860538482666, 0.788605809211731, 0.898299515247345, 0.8508225083351135, 0.8931910395622253, 0.9150735139846802, 0.7275564074516296, 0.7999537587165833, 0.8119152784347534, 0.8431658744812012, 0.823348343372345, 0.8754352927207947, 0.847358763217926, 0.8379312753677368, 0.8643767237663269, 0.9006229043006897, 0.6368153095245361, 0.8762741088867188, 0.8744538426399231, 0.9160565733909607, 0.843585193157196, 0.8897102475166321, 0.8472157120704651, 0.8775091171264648, 0.7074996829032898, 0.8366546034812927, 0.8734604120254517, 0.9065570831298828, 0.8363365530967712, 0.8638870120048523, 0.830017626285553, 0.7936761379241943, 0.8761215806007385, 0.9191649556159973, 0.9068530797958374, 0.8704541921615601, 0.8934229016304016, 0.9162713289260864, 0.883303701877594, 0.8732296824455261, 0.9009262919425964, 0.7690258622169495, 0.8821549415588379, 0.7165502905845642, 0.8163823485374451, 0.7961781024932861, 0.6540142893791199, 0.8169661164283752, 0.7982611656188965, 0.8900874257087708, 0.9181229472160339, 0.4706645905971527, 0.4556340277194977, 0.8755413889884949, 0.8772444128990173, 0.7703365683555603, 0.7782254219055176, 0.7937024235725403, 0.7359458208084106, 0.8287811875343323, 0.8673388957977295, 0.8562542796134949, 0.8737887740135193, 0.911978542804718, 0.9049040675163269, 0.9353217482566833, 0.9099346995353699, 0.9226288199424744, 0.8044655919075012, 0.8988900780677795, 0.9095187783241272, 0.8459397554397583, 0.87132728099823, 0.8977358341217041, 0.8944948315620422, 0.9499371647834778, 0.8897939920425415, 0.897432804107666, 0.8305685520172119, 0.8541730046272278, 0.784781277179718, 0.8925032615661621, 0.8516284823417664, 0.8684185147285461, 0.7833274602890015, 0.8339763879776001, 0.8912104964256287, 0.8385118246078491, 0.9204317927360535, 0.7425310015678406, 0.8871265053749084, 0.8740119338035583, 0.8222785592079163, 0.9326010346412659, 0.9168170690536499, 0.8333031535148621, 0.7358291745185852, 0.7260653972625732, 0.7231088280677795, 0.8943325877189636, 0.9213639497756958, 0.8083021640777588, 0.8162261843681335, 0.7052028179168701, 0.9125632643699646, 0.9030303359031677, 0.917834460735321, 0.9236587285995483, 0.8775569796562195, 0.9155246615409851, 0.9035178422927856, 0.8838595747947693, 0.8836612105369568, 0.8858955502510071, 0.8684645891189575, 0.9209260940551758, 0.8201296925544739, 0.8618342280387878, 0.9130845665931702, 0.9099569916725159, 0.766318142414093, 0.8105846047401428, 0.8443413972854614, 0.8904736638069153, 0.8860959410667419, 0.8567348718643188, 0.8097360134124756, 0.8709884285926819, 0.7444095015525818, 0.6776078939437866, 0.7966606020927429, 0.8028967380523682, 0.8988481163978577, 0.8232107758522034, 0.9442207217216492, 0.9001911282539368, 0.819966733455658, 0.8425701260566711, 0.9088516235351562, 0.9214014410972595, 0.933712363243103, 0.8283467888832092, 0.881927490234375, 0.4276559352874756, 0.5240321755409241, 0.8874433636665344, 0.8631885647773743, 0.8584376573562622, 0.8774175047874451, 0.5075876116752625, 0.740641713142395, 0.8962602615356445, 0.7887601852416992, 0.6681586503982544, 0.8614876866340637, 0.9149917960166931, 0.8691863417625427, 0.8785730004310608, 0.8823031783103943, 0.7834118604660034, 0.8091323971748352, 0.7288329601287842, 0.7272914052009583, 0.8687967658042908, 0.8437386155128479, 0.9250531196594238, 0.8884219527244568, 0.9087877869606018, 0.7236348986625671, 0.8837528228759766, 0.8659464716911316, 0.8941770792007446, 0.8565603494644165, 0.9022478461265564, 0.8765117526054382, 0.7718254327774048, 0.5870996713638306, 0.8838396668434143, 0.8516414761543274, 0.44692859053611755, 0.8588959574699402, 0.8137516975402832, 0.8647735714912415, 0.8952080607414246, 0.8989611268043518, 0.9050495624542236, 0.8884159326553345, 0.9166374802589417, 0.8602414727210999, 0.9219931364059448, 0.8930983543395996, 0.9073505401611328, 0.8675166964530945, 0.8831055164337158, 0.8942388892173767, 0.5867586731910706, 0.8900387287139893, 0.816082775592804, 0.8630693554878235, 0.8374860882759094, 0.9013888239860535, 0.8895378708839417, 0.7494230270385742, 0.9008355140686035, 0.8334484696388245, 0.869717001914978, 0.859964907169342, 0.8074654936790466, 0.9048628807067871, 0.8957623243331909, 0.8919787406921387, 0.8733692765235901, 0.8581374883651733, 0.8215644955635071, 0.8712841868400574, 0.8547585010528564, 0.8804890513420105, 0.873362123966217, 0.7552312016487122, 0.9407948851585388, 0.700305163860321, 0.8082825541496277, 0.7511391639709473, 0.8353201150894165, 0.818064272403717, 0.8133166432380676, 0.6353026032447815, 0.6043452620506287, 0.8662715554237366, 0.92275470495224, 0.8865576386451721, 0.9066187739372253, 0.6854264140129089, 0.844536304473877, 0.806335985660553, 0.8569360375404358, 0.8944872617721558, 0.6844238042831421, 0.8267709612846375, 0.8455130457878113, 0.8567732572555542, 0.8091385960578918, 0.8443209528923035, 0.9013177752494812, 0.9085273742675781, 0.9172680974006653, 0.877757728099823, 0.9007724523544312, 0.9245192408561707, 0.8628250360488892, 0.763295590877533, 0.7455456852912903, 0.9548798203468323, 0.7764132022857666, 0.9365461468696594, 0.8994413614273071, 0.8071293830871582, 0.902854859828949, 0.7205255031585693, 0.8324872851371765, 0.8452727794647217, 0.8916332721710205, 0.867350697517395, 0.8200454115867615, 0.8053258657455444, 0.900790274143219, 0.8266065120697021, 0.768356204032898, 0.9021080136299133, 0.8992557525634766, 0.890645444393158, 0.8763464093208313, 0.8745843768119812, 0.8642014265060425, 0.9074686169624329, 0.8948611617088318, 0.8579846024513245, 0.8640897274017334, 0.7844498753547668, 0.8824930787086487, 0.8578344583511353, 0.8590928912162781, 0.9034165740013123, 0.8691728711128235, 0.901839554309845, 0.8776262402534485, 0.8554019331932068, 0.8186371922492981, 0.8639299869537354, 0.5239308476448059, 0.8735423684120178, 0.8490399718284607, 0.927314817905426, 0.855450451374054, 0.8539767861366272, 0.8970490097999573, 0.9081653356552124, 0.9307060837745667, 0.8760622143745422, 0.8912366032600403, 0.8895416259765625, 0.9275640249252319, 0.9207156300544739, 0.8948166966438293, 0.7848597168922424, 0.903350293636322, 0.7637339234352112, 0.8945048451423645, 0.8779398798942566, 0.8487878441810608, 0.8301951885223389, 0.7745873928070068, 0.8895387053489685, 0.597762405872345, 0.879294753074646, 0.9260160326957703, 0.6957499384880066, 0.7112266421318054, 0.8434038758277893, 0.8473736643791199, 0.76310795545578, 0.8894398808479309, 0.6999531388282776, 0.7240362763404846, 0.8407446146011353, 0.7351917624473572, 0.7995747923851013, 0.835595965385437, 0.8579832315444946, 0.8126500248908997, 0.8351942896842957, 0.8435491919517517, 0.8854362964630127, 0.8836125135421753, 0.8810269236564636, 0.8879422545433044, 0.7757485508918762, 0.7420687675476074, 0.8561375141143799, 0.9117173552513123, 0.8724697828292847, 0.9097778797149658, 0.828637957572937, 0.8085510730743408, 0.9016651511192322, 0.884599506855011, 0.8466212749481201, 0.8869239687919617, 0.8979086875915527, 0.8318666815757751, 0.6420658230781555, 0.8690869808197021, 0.8270140886306763, 0.9376179575920105, 0.8675101399421692, 0.9115228056907654, 0.9435877203941345, 0.9136198163032532, 0.8662244081497192, 0.6698562502861023, 0.9412354826927185, 0.8457204699516296, 0.8841007351875305, 0.866775631904602, 0.8916588425636292, 0.7442591786384583, 0.7976254820823669, 0.753953218460083, 0.8083210587501526, 0.8913487792015076, 0.9253606796264648, 0.7981629967689514, 0.9390823245048523, 0.888834536075592, 0.8423089385032654, 0.8496899008750916, 0.8696868419647217, 0.8749263882637024, 0.650364339351654, 0.8830570578575134, 0.8962790369987488, 0.8636872172355652, 0.8414226770401001, 0.8671668171882629, 0.8801895380020142, 0.8867711424827576, 0.8597314357757568, 0.776321291923523, 0.7716242074966431, 0.8863208889961243, 0.775657594203949, 0.7579334378242493, 0.7574657797813416, 0.8325621485710144, 0.8876515626907349, 0.8671305775642395, 0.8896750807762146, 0.8432011008262634, 0.8668946027755737, 0.8001863360404968, 0.8995256423950195, 0.855261504650116, 0.8950121402740479, 0.8569193482398987, 0.9421680569648743, 0.38011935353279114, 0.7653835415840149, 0.8802022337913513, 0.9107799530029297, 0.9182319045066833, 0.6948075294494629, 0.7786791920661926, 0.873279869556427, 0.8209155201911926, 0.82611483335495, 0.8836875557899475, 0.8451038599014282, 0.8360595703125, 0.8921414017677307, 0.8877562880516052, 0.8597848415374756, 0.8646512031555176, 0.8843770623207092, 0.8823520541191101, 0.8213234543800354, 0.8135043978691101, 0.9274515509605408, 0.7866516709327698, 0.8535345196723938, 0.7407961487770081, 0.7740051746368408, 0.8729298710823059, 0.8479487299919128, 0.895255446434021, 0.9053457975387573, 0.874187171459198, 0.9190824627876282, 0.8826044201850891, 0.8667195439338684, 0.8832830786705017, 0.8809910416603088, 0.8935419917106628, 0.8744129538536072, 0.8482160568237305, 0.9034033417701721, 0.9180183410644531, 0.9021932482719421, 0.767458975315094, 0.9256367087364197, 0.8930886387825012, 0.8999695181846619, 0.8408687710762024, 0.6977651715278625, 0.8626452088356018, 0.8777772784233093, 0.9145633578300476, 0.8248133659362793, 0.8689877986907959, 0.7017620205879211, 0.9029985070228577, 0.9077206254005432, 0.80674809217453, 0.8288896083831787, 0.7603288888931274, 0.8809846639633179, 0.8819617033004761, 0.8974152207374573, 0.6657292246818542, 0.853119432926178, 0.8845110535621643, 0.8880511522293091, 0.7913991212844849, 0.9273326992988586, 0.9192909598350525, 0.8885005712509155, 0.8562496304512024, 0.8130894303321838, 0.9281003475189209, 0.7933192849159241, 0.7386327385902405, 0.8961054682731628, 0.9003099799156189, 0.8016948699951172, 0.7784481048583984, 0.8798106908798218, 0.8627805113792419, 0.8350078463554382, 0.9037704467773438, 0.9425544142723083, 0.9535076022148132, 0.867473840713501, 0.9089073538780212, 0.8088380098342896, 0.9002025723457336, 0.9193422794342041, 0.8750372529029846, 0.94643235206604, 0.8726201057434082, 0.8671513199806213, 0.8766675591468811, 0.7072774767875671, 0.8650482296943665, 0.8891600966453552, 0.7716706395149231, 0.8966677784919739, 0.9290274381637573, 0.8839333653450012, 0.8608132004737854, 0.8368669152259827, 0.831813395023346, 0.9220502376556396, 0.8287256956100464, 0.8506500124931335, 0.6805601119995117, 0.846135139465332, 0.8211648464202881, 0.9052640795707703, 0.8882519602775574, 0.8896585702896118, 0.9071599841117859, 0.8399829268455505, 0.7280616164207458, 0.7769569754600525, 0.8299474120140076, 0.9378405809402466, 0.8812212347984314, 0.9325829744338989, 0.8925506472587585, 0.6571959853172302, 0.8784343004226685, 0.8968361020088196, 0.9305810928344727, 0.9154385924339294, 0.9214697480201721, 0.8930667042732239, 0.8460145592689514, 0.9472556710243225, 0.8776673078536987, 0.8744572997093201, 0.8864696025848389, 0.8978124260902405, 0.7709713578224182, 0.8555775284767151, 0.8560148477554321, 0.6913594603538513, 0.8716126084327698, 0.8445740342140198, 0.9099487066268921, 0.8645579218864441, 0.8558510541915894, 0.8748148679733276, 0.8472244143486023, 0.909020721912384, 0.8571777939796448, 0.8960147500038147, 0.7233976721763611, 0.8735116124153137, 0.8809719085693359, 0.8666902184486389, 0.8751071095466614, 0.8568472266197205, 0.762712836265564, 0.8992471694946289, 0.9096602201461792, 0.8855499029159546, 0.9286578297615051, 0.7832764983177185, 0.9099226593971252, 0.8069172501564026, 0.8832239508628845, 0.8398415446281433, 0.8858405947685242, 0.8682870864868164, 0.8175795674324036, 0.9035459756851196, 0.7166531682014465, 0.7858693599700928, 0.8005849719047546, 0.8979081511497498, 0.8263276219367981, 0.9288040995597839, 0.8995929956436157, 0.8432597517967224, 0.8173007369041443, 0.892842710018158, 0.8958790898323059, 0.9108957648277283, 0.8426324725151062, 0.8618620038032532, 0.8640593886375427, 0.9173981547355652, 0.874232828617096, 0.8865061402320862, 0.8991666436195374, 0.8543924689292908, 0.9195696711540222, 0.8080188035964966, 0.8263785243034363, 0.8846100568771362, 0.8918863534927368, 0.761034369468689, 0.8991202712059021, 0.873949408531189, 0.8135489821434021, 0.8832114338874817, 0.901515543460846, 0.8820338845252991, 0.8268339037895203, 0.8941518068313599, 0.8325427174568176, 0.8712351322174072, 0.8551058173179626, 0.8009753823280334, 0.9007447957992554, 0.9095246195793152, 0.8848214745521545, 0.908883273601532, 0.8834734559059143, 0.9199426770210266, 0.8710706830024719, 0.908907949924469, 0.7531553506851196, 0.865037202835083, 0.8920426964759827, 0.9331889152526855, 0.8797498941421509, 0.9072693586349487, 0.8248188495635986, 0.8868622183799744, 0.8868594765663147, 0.8994346261024475, 0.8546181321144104, 0.857348620891571, 0.8079922795295715, 0.8723308444023132, 0.9115439057350159, 0.5596711039543152, 0.8808693885803223, 0.8374925255775452, 0.8899433612823486, 0.6947364211082458, 0.8815022110939026, 0.8762691617012024, 0.8960973620414734, 0.913307785987854, 0.9134981036186218, 0.888511598110199, 0.8836644291877747, 0.8833654522895813, 0.821986198425293, 0.8666990995407104, 0.96678227186203, 0.8125991225242615, 0.8363876342773438, 0.725560188293457, 0.8669968843460083, 0.7497567534446716, 0.9037825465202332, 0.8361201286315918, 0.8695524334907532, 0.8435336947441101, 0.9097971320152283, 0.9136629700660706, 0.9109854698181152, 0.8663035035133362, 0.8653227686882019, 0.6542530059814453, 0.900425136089325, 0.9160586595535278, 0.9110644459724426, 0.778535783290863, 0.8641752600669861, 0.819884717464447, 0.8564401268959045, 0.8069104552268982, 0.9110814929008484, 0.8939218521118164, 0.8256468176841736, 0.8776600956916809, 0.911309540271759, 0.7246145009994507, 0.848400890827179, 0.879763126373291, 0.8140468001365662, 0.8778201937675476, 0.6732608079910278, 0.8759473562240601, 0.8905866742134094, 0.6870557069778442, 0.8729880452156067, 0.8530363440513611, 0.8904692530632019, 0.8288614153862, 0.8731898665428162, 0.8960064649581909, 0.9071848392486572, 0.6149184703826904, 0.8275776505470276, 0.8666999936103821, 0.6860236525535583, 0.8809018731117249, 0.7892958521842957, 0.8656256794929504, 0.8009520769119263, 0.8253450989723206, 0.8659284710884094, 0.8113437294960022, 0.9016621112823486, 0.8075025081634521, 0.8145187497138977, 0.8211820721626282, 0.8492490649223328, 0.8744881749153137, 0.9137469530105591, 0.8695885539054871, 0.722556471824646, 0.871629536151886, 0.8919716477394104, 0.8861739039421082, 0.8918059468269348, 0.8434015512466431, 0.8807031512260437, 0.8532317280769348, 0.8698814511299133, 0.35430750250816345, 0.939198911190033, 0.8430240750312805, 0.9260127544403076, 0.8804248571395874, 0.9219996929168701, 0.8468717932701111, 0.9012963771820068, 0.8110039830207825, 0.9151675701141357, 0.8281665444374084, 0.9370250701904297, 0.8992743492126465, 0.9012253880500793, 0.8528153300285339, 0.8263980150222778, 0.7192081212997437, 0.8344921469688416, 0.8747738599777222, 0.8369222283363342, 0.8272190093994141, 0.8864174485206604, 0.8309817314147949, 0.8338381052017212, 0.6589668393135071, 0.8878478407859802, 0.8898164629936218, 0.8537371754646301, 0.8370837569236755, 0.9063644409179688, 0.8607543706893921, 0.8465850949287415, 0.8722856640815735, 0.8796239495277405, 0.871751606464386, 0.8910729289054871, 0.7447511553764343, 0.8220736384391785, 0.8685298562049866, 0.8740672469139099, 0.9229962229728699, 0.8870474696159363, 0.8064415454864502, 0.9593567252159119, 0.9189128279685974, 0.8556708097457886, 0.8589912056922913, 0.9072507619857788, 0.8577976226806641, 0.44618669152259827, 0.9031460881233215, 0.916688859462738, 0.7856003642082214, 0.8911922574043274, 0.8590539693832397, 0.7888177633285522, 0.8826707005500793, 0.9162824749946594, 0.8775637745857239, 0.8803479075431824, 0.8430435657501221, 0.9034237265586853, 0.8531614542007446, 0.816785991191864, 0.8084051012992859, 0.8403410315513611, 0.8766745328903198, 0.8752501606941223, 0.9317012429237366, 0.8471895456314087, 0.9086784720420837, 0.9199796915054321, 0.9470831751823425, 0.8865312933921814, 0.8661949038505554, 0.8262498378753662, 0.8428649306297302, 0.9034599661827087, 0.8816099166870117, 0.8641293048858643, 0.9055147767066956, 0.8046004772186279, 0.8287495970726013, 0.8424160480499268, 0.78252774477005, 0.856339693069458, 0.8912732601165771, 0.8552525043487549, 0.9157180786132812, 0.8722587823867798, 0.9382894039154053, 0.6484711170196533, 0.8661913871765137, 0.8338617086410522, 0.8799927830696106, 0.9433110356330872, 0.8426966071128845, 0.8897837996482849, 0.7870592474937439, 0.8503587245941162, 0.8305206894874573, 0.8060157895088196, 0.8562736511230469, 0.7318282723426819, 0.8534677624702454, 0.8822456002235413, 0.8713173270225525, 0.8859723806381226, 0.7513400912284851, 0.8255777955055237, 0.8698487877845764, 0.8204997777938843, 0.8663950562477112, 0.859233558177948, 0.8856399059295654, 0.9074034094810486, 0.8833523392677307, 0.7770721316337585, 0.9070985317230225, 0.7826278805732727, 0.7078374028205872, 0.9166433215141296, 0.8189350366592407, 0.9030217528343201, 0.8751275539398193, 0.623207151889801, 0.878993809223175, 0.8899146914482117, 0.8653420209884644, 0.5667682886123657, 0.8621084094047546, 0.9023663401603699, 0.8475325107574463, 0.9051221013069153, 0.8208106160163879, 0.8561632633209229, 0.8712638020515442, 0.8040111660957336, 0.9087029099464417, 0.9358714818954468, 0.8473098278045654, 0.7862531542778015, 0.8733524084091187]}